Website
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy
Your security
Cookies
Mobile app
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy
Policies
Website Terms and Conditions
The following terms and conditions apply if you access our services via a web browser. To view the terms and conditions for the Mobile App please
go here
Each time you access or use
www.Reed.co.uk
and/or our mobile device application (collectively the "Website"), you are deemed to accept these terms and conditions.
"we" means Reed Online Ltd, and "our" shall be construed accordingly. "you" means the person, firm, company or organisation browsing and/or using the Website, and "your" shall be construed accordingly. "Reed Corporate Family" means all companies connected with us. A company is connected with us if it is: (i) a subsidiary or holding company of us; (ii) controlled by the same person(s) who control us or our holding company; (iii) a subsidiary or holding company of any company in (i) or (ii) above; or (iv) in the same group as any company under (i), (ii) or (iii) above. "subsidiary" and "holding company" shall be as defined in section 1159 of the Companies Act 2006. The term "control" shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 416 of the Income and Corporation Taxes Act 1988. Two companies are in the same group if they share the same ultimate holding company.
Interruptions and Omissions in Service
Whilst we try to ensure that the standard of the Website remains high and to maintain the continuity of it, the internet is not an inherently stable medium, and errors, omissions, interruptions of service and delays may occur at any time. We do not accept any liability arising from any such errors, omissions, interruptions or delays or any ongoing obligation or responsibility to operate the Website (or any particular part of it) or to provide the service offered on the Website. We may vary the specification of this site from time to time without notice.
Links to other Sites
On this site you will be offered automatic links to other sites which we hope will be of interest to you. We do not accept any responsibility for or liability in respect of the content of those sites, the owners of which do not necessarily have any connection, commercial or otherwise, with us. Using automatic links to gain access to such sites is entirely at your own risk.
Information on this Site
Whilst we make every effort to ensure that the information on our Website is accurate and complete, some of the information is supplied to us by third parties and we are not able to check the accuracy or completeness of that information. We do not accept any liability arising from any inaccuracy or omission in any of the information on our Website or any liability in respect of information on the Website supplied by you, any other website user or any other person.
Your Use of this Site
You may only use the Website for lawful purposes when seeking employment or help with your career, when purchasing training courses or when recruiting staff. You must not under any circumstances seek to undermine the security of the Website or any information submitted to or available through it. In particular, but without limitation, you must not seek to access, alter or delete any information to which you do not have authorised access, seek to overload the system via spamming or flooding, take any action or use any device, routine or software to crash, delay, damage or otherwise interfere with the operation of the Website or attempt to decipher, disassemble or modify any of the software, coding or information comprised in the Website.
You are solely responsible for any information submitted by you to the Website. You are responsible for ensuring that all information supplied by you is true, accurate, up-to-date and not misleading or likely to mislead or deceive and that it is not discriminatory, obscene, offensive, defamatory or otherwise illegal, unlawful or in breach of any applicable legislation, regulations, guidelines or codes of practice or the copyright, trademark or other intellectual property rights of any person in any jurisdiction. You are also responsible for ensuring that all information, data and files are free of viruses or other routines or engines that may damage or interfere with any system or data prior to being submitted to the Website. We reserve the right to remove any information supplied by you from the Website at our sole discretion, at any time and for any reason without being required to give any explanation.
Information Submitted by You
We will and/or the Reed Corporate Family will use information supplied by you to aid the recruitment process and associated administrative functions as well as to facilitate the purchase of training courses made through this website. We will process any data which you provide in completing the online registration or application forms and any further forms, assessments or personal details which you complete or provide to us when using the Website in accordance with relevant data protection legislation. We explain more about your personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please note that all Third Party recruitment agencies have agreed to our Terms and Conditions and should they be found to be in breach of the Terms and Conditions, they will be prevented from using our services.
Further details of our client terms and conditions
.
Transfer outside the EEA: Personal information comprising your CV or contact details may be accessed through the Reed.co.uk database by third parties outside the European Economic Area ("EEA"). This could happen for instance if you apply for a vacancy where the employer is based outside the EEA or where you purchase a training course from a course provider who operates from outside the EEA.
Terms of Business
Recruitment:  All prospective employers and clients will be provided with applicable terms and conditions before they can access the services we make available through the Website.
Training Courses: Any training course purchased through this website will be subject to the terms issued by the course providers. If you are using DivideBuy to spread the cost of your course some different terms apply. Please see
DivideBuy's terms
and
FAQs
for more details.
DivideBuy are an independent payment provider and Reed has no influence over whether your payment with DivideBuy is accepted or not. If you have any trouble with your order, please contact
DivideBuy Customer Service
.
Content Rights
The rights in material on the Website are protected by international copyright, software and trademark laws and you agree to use the Website in a way which does not infringe these rights. You may copy material on the Website for your own private or domestic purposes, but no copying for any commercial or business use is permitted.
Security and Passwords
In order to register with the Website and to sign in when you visit the Website, you will need to use a username and password. You are solely responsible for the security and proper use of your password, which should be kept confidential at all times and not disclosed to any other person. You must notify us immediately if you believe that your password is known to someone else or if it may be used in an unauthorised way. We accept no liability for any unauthorised or improper use or disclosure of any password.
Termination
We may terminate your registration and/or deny you access to the Website or any part of it (including any services, goods or information available on or through the Website) at any time in our absolute discretion and without any explanation or notification.
Liability
We accept no liability for any loss (whether direct or indirect, for loss of business, revenue or profits, wasted expenditure, corruption or destruction of data or for any other indirect or consequential loss whatsoever) arising from your use of the Website and we hereby exclude any such liability, whether in contract, tort (including for negligence) or otherwise. We hereby exclude all representations, warranties and conditions relating to the Website and your use of it to the maximum extent permitted by law.
You agree to indemnify us and keep us indemnified against all costs, expenses, claims, losses, liabilities or proceedings arising from use or misuse by you of the Website.
You must notify us immediately if anyone makes or threatens to make any claim against you relating to your use of the Website.
Choice of Law and Jurisdiction
The use of the Website and any agreements entered into through the Website are to be governed by and construed in accordance with English law. The courts of England are to have exclusive jurisdiction to settle any dispute arising out of or in connection with the use of the Website or any agreement made through the Website.
Some of the goods or services offered through the Website may not be lawful or may otherwise not be permitted in certain countries outside the United Kingdom. If you attempt to order, receive, purchase or otherwise benefit from any such goods or services, we do not accept any liability for any losses suffered by you in using the Website which you would not have suffered had you been accessing the Website as a United Kingdom resident (including as a result of us being prevented from dealing with any application or enquiry by any law, regulation or other ruling applicable in any country).
Modern Slavery Act statement
We are committed to ensuring that there is no modern slavery or human trafficking in our supply chains or in any part of our business. For our full Modern Slavery Act statement, please
click here
.
Changes to Terms and Conditions and Invalidity
These terms and conditions may be changed by us at any time. You will be deemed to accept the terms and conditions (as amended) when you next use the Website following any amendment.
If any provision of these terms and conditions is held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions, which shall remain in full force and effect.
Registered Office
Reed Online Ltd
Academy Court
94 Chancery Lane
London
WC2A 1DT
Company Number 6317279. Registered in the UK.
Website Privacy policy
The following privacy policy applies if you access our services via a web browser. To view the privacy policy for the Mobile App please
go here
.
www.Reed.co.uk
("the Website") is a job site operated by Reed Online Limited. We are part of the REED Corporate Family
This privacy policy explains how we use the personal information we collect about you when you use the Website.
If you register on the Website as a recruiter or course provider and provide us with personal data, we will process such personal data on the basis that it is necessary to do so in order to perform the contract you enter into with us. We may also contact you via email to invite you to review any services and/or products you received from us in order to collect your feedback and improve our services and products (the "Purpose"). We use an external company, Trustpilot A/S ("Trustpilot"), to collect your feedback which means that we will share your name, email address and reference number with Trustpilot for the Purpose. The lawful basis for sharing personal data with Trustpilot for the Purpose is to pursue our legitimate interest. Trustpilot acts as our data processor and will not use your personal data for any reason other than the Purpose. If you want to read more about how Trustpilot will process your data, you can find their Privacy Policy
here
. This policy is of particular relevance should you decide to open an account with Trustpilot.
What we do
Registration with and use of the Website for job seekers and those looking to purchase courses or receive career advice is free. When you register as a job seeker, you engage with us to provide you with online recruitment services. The service includes providing you with regular bespoke updates of relevant vacancies and relevant courses which may be of interest to you. These updates will be provided as job alerts and course alerts which we will email to you (or send by SMS messaging where relevant). Job alerts and course alerts may provide details of vacancies and courses of third-party providers and when you express an interest in any of these third-party job alerts or course alerts by clicking on the relevant link in the emails, you may be taken directly to the website of our third-party providers without the need to log into your Reed account first.
If you do not want to receive that information from us, we give you the opportunity to opt out both as part of the registration process and at any time by updating your contact preferences in your account or by clicking on the "unsubscribe" link within those emails.
Lawful basis for processing of your personal data
Legitimate Interest:
We process your personal data when it is in our legitimate interests to do this in order to provide our services. Our legitimate interests include (but are not limited to) the following: introducing of job seekers and those interested in courses to recruiters and course providers; transmission of job alerts and course alerts; the measures we take in order to ensure the security and integrity of the services we provide; promoting, marketing and advertising of our products and services; analysis of our users’ behaviour, activities, preferences and requirements; understanding of existing products and services and the development of new products and services; the handling of customer contacts, queries and complaints; making available the services through the Website to our users (providers of courses, recruiters, job seekers and those intending to buy course or those just expressing an interest in learning more about the products offered by us; the sharing of personal data with our third party suppliers (e.g. communication providers) who act as our data processors to enable us to provide our services; the provision of your contact details, name, IP Address, country of residence and payment confirmation (if relevant) to any course providers where you purchase a course through the Website. Where you only make an inquiry into a course available through the Website, we will only process your personal data as required on the inquiry form.
Consent:
On some occasions, we may process your personal data with your consent. When your consent is required, we will clearly indicate this (e.g. when we share your CV with external CV review partners). You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. When you do so, we will cease to process such data.
The processing is required under legal obligation:
We may process your personal data to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation e.g. detecting, preventing or investigating crime or fraud including working with law enforcement agencies.
What Information do we collect about you?
The personal information we collect about you may include the following:
The information set out in your CV,
Information to enable us to provide our services e.g. your date of birth and location, your preferred job location and the kind of work you are interested in,
General identification and contact information e.g. your name, IP address, residential address, email and telephone details,
Marketing preferences,
Statistical information e.g. aggregate statistical information about site visits,
We collect the personal data about you when you register with the Website. We do so in order to provide you with the recruitment services that are available through the Website as well as for administrative purposes when you purchase or enquire about courses available through the Website. We also collect your personal data on behalf of our sister company, Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited who provides services similar to ours. Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited will process your personal data in accordance with their own Privacy Notice which can be found
here
. If you decide to upload a CV, cover letter, personal statement or other similar document or information we will keep that information for as long as you want to keep your account with the Website.
If you decide to purchase any courses through the Website you will be directed to either the Course Provider directly, or to a third-party payment provider (e.g Sagepay, Paypal, Dividebuy) to complete payment.
If you choose to take any assessments available through the Website, we will also maintain a record of your responses to and results of those assessments.
If you register for career advice, we only require your name and email address.
What do we do with your personal data?
Job Seekers:
By registering with the Website, it is understood that job seekers are actively soliciting contact from prospective employers and recruiters about opportunities which match the job seekers’ fields of interest as well as relevant courses which may improve a job seeker’s career prospects. If you are a job seeker, we will therefore make your personal data available to recruiters and employers who use the Website to find suitable employees for specific roles that they are seeking to fill and also provide you with course alerts informing you of relevant courses which may be of interest to you.
Although the primary purpose of the Website is to allow job seekers, prospective employers and recruiters to find each other, job seekers have the ability to control the extent to which your personal data is shared with other recruiters and prospective employers through the contact preferences section of the "your account" section on the Website.
For job seekers, we will use your personal data to supply you with the recruitment services that we provide including job alerts and course alerts, to manage your account and to provide you with information about our recruitment services as well as ancillary services available through the Website.
Course Seekers
If you are registering with the Website because you have an interest in the courses advertised through it, your details will be used to provide you with course alerts, to manage your account, to put you in touch with the relevant third party course providers and facilitate payment for the course (where relevant), to provide the course to you if the course is provided by us, to provide you with courses information that is relevant to your field of interest and to contact you to provide feedback on our services.
If you do want to receive that information from us, we give you the opportunity to opt out both as part of the registration process and at any time by updating your contact preferences in your account or by clicking on the "unsubscribe" link within those emails.
Candidates who register for Career Advice only:
If you register for career advice, we will only communicate with you to provide career advice, access to career advice and in connection with related services. This advice will normally consist of a monthly newsletter. You have the right to opt out of receiving such communication from us at any time.
Marketing
From time to time, we would like to tell you more about the other goods and services available through the Website. We will do this by sending you marketing emails if you subscribe to them when you sign up to the website (by ticking the relevant box where indicated). You can subsequently unsubscribe by clicking the unsubscribe link in every subsequent marketing email.
You can also amend the contact preferences in your account at any time to stop us from contacting you in connection with the recruitment services or courses available through the Website, including job alerts and course alerts, for which you register when you set up your account.
Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited may also send you marketing information relating to the services it provides and which may be of interest to you. You have the right to opt out of receiving such marketing information at any time.
We use tracking pixels in our marketing emails. These pixels provide us with information in relation to your interaction with the emails (e.g. if you opened the email). This information helps us to better understand how customers engage with our content and to analyse the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns. You can disable tracking pixels by changing your email settings to block the loading or display of external images.
Data Sharing and Transfers
Job Seekers:
As part of the recruitment services we provide to help you find a suitable job, we may make your personal data available to third parties such as recruiters, direct employers and their agents or other business partners. We attempt to verify the identity of these third parties when they sign up with us, however we do not make any warranties as to their authenticity. This would normally happen when you apply for a job through the Website or when a recruiter downloads your CV as part of the services they purchase from us.  These parties will also be data controllers of your personal data. The amount of personal data we share with these parties depends on the options you select when you create or update your account. We will also share your personal data with our sister company, Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited, for the reasons set out in this privacy notice.
Courses:
When you purchase or enquire about a course available through the Website, we will make your personal data available to the course provider to enable it to provide the course to you. The course provider will be a data controller in relation to your personal data.
All users
We may share your personal data with third party service providers who assist us in carrying out our business activities. These third parties act as our data processors and are bound by strict contractual provisions to only process your personal data under our instructions and for the limited purposes we permit them. These third parties include (but are not limited to) our accountants; auditors; external legal advisors; external IT providers; support and hosting service providers; printing, advertising, marketing and market research and analysis service providers, technical engineers, data storage and cloud providers and all other outsourced service providers (such as communication providers) that assist us in the provision of our services.
We may also share your personal data with courts, tribunals, regulators and other governmental and public authorities (such as the police or tax authorities) to: (i) allow us to pursue legal remedies, (ii) to enforce our terms and conditions and protect our operations, (iii) to comply with legal process, (iv) to comply with applicable law, and (v) to respond to requests from public and governmental bodies.
Your personal data is stored on our servers which are in the European Economic Area. Your personal data may be processed outside the EEA where you apply for a job advertised by a recruiter outside the EEA, where such recruiter downloads your CV, or where you purchase a course from a course provider outside the EEA. In such situations, we enter into legally binding contracts with such recruiters and course providers to aim to ensure that your personal data is protected.
Access to your information and correction
We want to make sure that your information is accurate and up-to-date and will delete or amend any information that you think is inaccurate. Should you wish to delete your account please
contact us via the online form
. Amendments to your account can be made online by
signing in to your account
or by
contacting us
.
We aim to provide you with useful work-related services for the whole of your career. However, you have the right to close your account at any time and have us delete all of your personal information unless we are in the process of responding to any complaint that you make.
Cookies
Cookies are text files placed on your computer to collect standard internet log and visitor behaviour information. This information is used to track visitor use of the Website, to compile statistical reports on Website activity and to help us make recommendations that are relevant to you.
We also use third party advertising companies to serve ads when you visit the Website. Those companies may use information about your visits to this and other websites in order to provide you with advertisements about other goods and services that may be of interest to you.
If you would like more information about this practice, including how to prevent it, please visit
www.aboutcookies.org
,
www.allaboutcookies.org
or
optout.networkadvertising.org
More information about all of the cookies on the Website is available on our
cookies page
.
Other websites
Our Website contains links to other websites. This privacy policy only applies to this Website, so when you link to other websites you should review their own privacy policies.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
We keep our privacy policy under regular review and we place any updates on this web page. This policy was last updated on 16 June 2021.
How to contact us
Please contact us if you have any questions about our privacy policy or information we hold about you:
by email
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
or write to us at Data Protection Officer, Reed Online Limited, Academy Court, 94 Chancery Lane, London, WC2A 1DT.
How do you remove your name from the database?
You can
contact us
to request for your account to be closed at any time, which will be confirmed by Reed.
How do you unsubscribe from future mailings?
If you have a Reed.co.uk jobseeker account, you can stop receiving marketing emails by
updating your contact preferences
.
How can you obtain information held about you?
You have the right to request a copy of the information that we hold about you. If you would like a copy of some or all of your personal information please email us at
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
.
Complaints
If you would like to make a complaint about how your information is being used by us, or how your complaint has been handled, you have the right to lodge a complaint directly with the Information Commissioner’s Office or our Data Protection Officer. You can write to us at
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
, or to the Information Commissioner’s Office at: Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF (or by email to casework@ico.org,uk).
Registered Office
Reed Online Ltd
Academy Court
94 Chancery Lane
London
WC2A 1DT
Company Number 6317279. Registered in the UK.
Your security on Reed.co.uk
At Reed.co.uk, we're committed to helping you find the right job in a safe and secure environment.
On these pages, you can learn more about some of the most common internet security threats, what you can do to protect yourself, and what we do to ensure your details remain secure.
Common security threats
Money laundering:
Jobseekers are an increasingly common target for money laundering scam emails. Typically, these emails concern a job offer and the sender may claim to have found your details on a job site such as Reed.co.uk. They often offer job titles such as 'transaction manager' or 'accounts assistant'.
Money laundering scams usually have five key stages:
A jobseeker responds to a fake email job offer
The jobseeker is asked for their bank details
A cheque is paid into the jobseeker's bank account
The jobseeker is instructed to transfer a portion of the funds into another account (often via a money transfer service, such as Western Union or Moneygram) and keep the remainder as their payment
Once the jobseeker has transferred the money, the cheque bounces and the victim is left with the debt
Falling victim to a money laundering scam is not only distressing, it can also affect credit ratings and bring victims under suspicion of criminal activity.
However, there are a number of tell-tale signs to look out for to help you spot a potential money laundering scam:
Are you being offered an opportunity to work from home?
Usually, this type of scam email includes the offer of a great opportunity to work from home as a transaction processor or similar.
Is the salary offered realistic?
Usually, the fake jobs being offered in this type of scam offer an unrealistically high salary.
Are you being asked for bank details?
Money laundering scammers will ask you for your bank details. You should never give these out to a company you don't completely trust.
Do you have a personal contact?
In most money laundering scams, communication will be carried out entirely over email and/or instant messaging, with no telephone or face to face contact.
Are there spelling and grammar mistakes in the email?
Money laundering scam emails often originate from outside the UK and spelling and grammar mistakes are common.
If you're suspicious of any email you receive, please
contact us
including the subject line of the email you received, and the email address it was sent from.
Phishing:
Phishing emails are an increasingly common method used to try and gain access to personal details in order to carry out fraud or
identity theft
.
Typically, a phishing email will claim to have been sent by a reputable organisation and ask that you respond to the email with your username and/or password or that you enter your sign in details over a 'secure' connection.
Whilst phishing emails can seem very professional, there are usually a number of clues to alert you to the fraudulent nature of the emails. When reading an email claiming to be sent from Reed.co.uk, you should always keep the following questions in mind:
Are you being asked to provide your password?
Reed.co.uk will
never
ask you to provide your password in response to an email or phone call.
Are there spelling and grammar mistakes in the email?
Phishing emails often originate from outside the UK and spelling and grammar mistakes are common.
Are you being asked to download something?
If you don't recognise a file, don't download it. All Reed.co.uk account details are stored online, so we'll never ask you to download anything to use the service.
Are you being threatened with losing access to your account?
Phishing emails sometimes make it seem like you'll lose access to your account unless you download something or provide your sign in details. Reed.co.uk will never ask you to do anything like this in order to keep your account open.
If you're suspicious of any email you receive from Reed.co.uk, please
contact us
with the subject line of the email, and the email address it was sent from.
Spoofing:
Spoofing occurs when a criminal creates an exact copy of a website in order to make a fraudulent company look legitimate. A spoofed website will usually look exactly the same as the website of a legitimate company, but with a slightly different web address (e.g., '.biz' instead of '.com' or '.co.uk'). If you're suspicious of any website you're directed to as a result of your dealings with Reed.co.uk, please
contact us
and we'll investigate.
Identity theft
Identity theft occurs when an individual steals personal details from someone else, and uses the information to fraudulently impersonate that individual. Victims of identity theft often find that their details are used to open bank accounts and obtain credit in their name.
Identity theft can only take place where a criminal has been able to gain access to enough personal details to create false documents in another person's name. In order to avoid becoming a victim of identity theft:
Never give out sensitive personal information such as your bank details, date of birth, National Insurance number or a copy of your passport in relation to an email
Look out for spelling and grammar mistakes in emails you receive
Never give out your sign in details in response to an email
If you suspect that you've been a victim of identity theft, you should contact the police as soon as possible. Details on how to report a fraud can be found
here
.
Stay safe with SAFERjobs
To stay safe in your job search we recommend that you visit SAFERjobs, a non-profit, joint industry and law enforcement organisation working to combat job scams. Visit the
SAFERjobs website
for information on common scams and to get free, expert advice for a safer job search.
What you can do to protect yourself
Account security
Online security risks can be minimised simply by ensuring that your password is always kept secure. We recommend you follow the password security advice below:
Always use a password which is personal and does not contain your name, email address or the word 'password'
Ensure your password contains both letters and numbers
Never give your password out to anyone - we will
never
ask you for your password
Change your password at least once every three months
Take a moment to memorise your password so you don't need to write it down
Try and use a different password for each different website you use
CV security
Uploading your CV to Reed.co.uk is an important part of the work finding process, and could help you to be headhunted for great roles. It's important you provide enough information on your CV for recruiters to contact you
However, in order to ensure your security online, you should never include any of the following in your CV:
National Insurance number
Driving license number
Bank details
Credit card details
Passwords
Date of birth
General advice
It's always important to be mindful of your security and safety online. Look at our top 10 tips to staying safe online to make sure you're not putting yourself at risk.
If it looks too good to be true, it probably is.
Be wary of offers for jobs paying a high salary for working from home.
Never provide personal details when looking for a job.
There's no need for a recruiter to request your bank details before you've been through the interview process and been offered a role.
Never agree to process funds through your personal bank account on behalf of a company.
Any legitimate company will have corporate accounts, so would never ask you to do this.
Never provide your personal details over a non-secure connection.
If you're being asked to enter login credentials, look for the "https://" at the beginning of the website address.
Don't put personal information on your CV.
Recruiters don't need to see your date of birth or national insurance number on your CV.
Look out for bad spelling and grammar.
Email scams often originate from outside the UK so may not contain perfect English.
Never provide your username and password in an email purporting to be from Reed.co.uk.
We'll never ask you to provide this information in an email.
Be wary of recruiters with no personal contact.
It's very unlikely that a recruiter would offer you a job without a telephone and/or face to face interview.
Keep your password secure and up-to-date.
Passwords should be changed at least once every three months and shouldn't contain your name, email address or the word 'password'.
If in doubt, report it.
If you're suspicious about any contact you receive related to Reed.co.uk,
contact us
and our Customer Support Team will investigate.
If you think you have been the victim of online fraud, we recommend you report it to Action Fraud, the national fraud and internet crime reporting centre, who will be able to advise you further.
You can contact Action Fraud on 0300 123 2040, or visit their website for advice
http://www.actionfraud.police.uk/
What we're doing to protect you
We've partnered with several industry leaders to ensure you receive the most secure levels of service possible whilst using the site.
Encryption
To protect your personal information Reed.co.uk uses industry standards such as TLS (Transport Layer Security) encryption to encrypt and secure your data.
Virus protection
Reed.co.uk automatically scans, detects, and quarantines new viruses, ensuring that all documents uploaded to or downloaded from Reed.co.uk, including your CV, are safe and virus-free.
Data
Reed.co.uk's servers are securely hosted and managed by
Ensono
, Europe's leading specialist in operating internet and enterprise applications. Attenda is ISO27001 accredited, the international standard for Information Security Management Systems (ISMS). In addition, Reed.co.uk works with
Westpoint Ltd
, who provide ongoing vulnerability assessment services and security monitoring of Reed.co.uk's servers.
Reed.co.uk cookies
What are cookies?
A cookie is a piece of information in the form of a very small text file that is placed on an internet user's computer. It is generated by a web page server (which is basically the computer that operates the web site) and can be used by that server whenever the user visits the site. A cookie can be thought of as an internet user's identification card, which tells a web site when the user has returned.
Cookies can't harm your computer and we don't store any personally identifiable information about you on any of our cookies.
Why do we use cookies on Reed.co.uk?
Reed.co.uk uses two types of cookies: cookies set by Reed.co.uk and cookies set by third parties (i.e. other websites or services).
Reed.co.uk cookies enable us to keep you signed in to your account throughout your visit and to tailor the information displayed on the site to your preferences, such as recommending jobs.
We also use third party cookies to help deliver relevant jobs, courses and advertising both on Reed.co.uk and on other websites, to integrate content with social networks, such as Facebook and Google+, and to better understand how the features and functions of the site are used in order that we can improve our service.
If you would like more information about the cookies we use, as well as details on how to opt-out, please see below.
What cookies do we use on Reed.co.uk?
Below is a list of the main cookies set by Reed.co.uk, and what each is used for:
Cookie name
Purpose
ReedRecentJobSearchs
Remembers the last ten searches you've run on Reed.co.uk and displays them on the homepage
ReedSavedJobs
Remembers any jobs you've saved when you're signed out of your account. When you sign in, the jobs are saved to your account and the cookie is deleted
ReedPageSize
Remembers the number of jobs per page you selected on search results and displays this on your next visit
Reed_ASP.NET_SessionId
Remembers your session — used to display 'back to search results' links and other session specific information
Reed.co.ukV10Auth
Keeps you signed in to your account once you've signed in
RequestVerificationToken_LW__
Provides security in requests and form submissions
LastSearchTime and NewJobsSinceTime
Used in conjunction to show you jobs that were added after you last used the site
UserLastSignedInDate
Used when your session has expired to know when we've logged you in automatically
LastEmailedSavedJobsTo
Used to remember and pre-fill the email address you most recently emailed a job to
LastSearchedLocation
Used to remember and pre-fill the most recent location you entered in a job search
Pardot
Gathers site activity data to better allow us to understand usage for sales purposes
ReedTestGroup
Allocates visitors to the site into a test group so we can test new journeys and features
Reed.Activity
Gathers site activity to enable targeting for advertising
Reed.co.ukFreecruitmentAuth
Keeps you signed in to your account, once you've signed in to Reed.co.uk/recruiter
reed.utmx
Contains information used for testing new journeys and features
NewJobsSinceTime
Remembers the last time a user ran a search so we can show jobs they haven't seen before
ReedJobSearch
Records last location searched for so the location can be prefilled when running a search.
cookieLegislation
Remembers we have shown users the Cookie banner
directRegWithCV
Records that a user has registered, then uploaded a CV. This is used to modify how the web page is displayed.
CourseBasketKey
Stores your basket key
CourseCompareKey
Stores your compare tool key
LinkSourceTracker
Stores your source
.AspNet.ApplicationCookie
Providers site sign in cookie
Cookies set by third parties
Reed.co.uk works with a number of third parties to provide services which help us to keep the website tailored to our users' needs. Some of these partners use cookies to help them deliver these services. A list of third party cookies can be found below:
Cookie name
Purpose
TinyMCE
Allows text to be pasted into the covering letter on job applications
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://tinymcesupport.com/privacy
Google Analytics
This website uses Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. ("Google"). Google Analytics uses "cookies", which are text files placed on your computer to help the website analyse how visitors use the site. The information generated by the cookie about your use of the website (including your IP address) will be transmitted to and stored by Google on servers in the United States . Google will use this information for the purpose of evaluating your use of the website, compiling reports on website activity for website operators and providing other services relating to website activity and internet usage. Google may also transfer this information to third parties where required to do so by law, or where such third parties process the information on Google's behalf. Google will not associate your IP address with any other data held by Google. You may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on your browser, however please note that if you do this you may not be able to use the full functionality of this website. By using this website, you consent to the processing of data about you by Google in the manner and for the purposes set out above.
To opt out of Google Analytics please go to the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
HotJar
HotJar cookies are used to remember whether you have taken part in a survey or poll.
To opt out of Hotjar please go to the following link:
https://www.hotjar.com/opt-out
Twitter
If you use a 'Tweet' link on Reed.co.uk to share content on twitter, twitter sets a cookie to remember that you've already shared this information.
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://twitter.com/privacy
. Twitter tags allow us to show relevant adverts on Twitter to users that have previously visited our website.
To reject these cookies:
https://support.twitter.com/articles/20170405%20
Google reCAPTCHA
(Google Ireland Limited)
We use Google reCAPTCHA which helps us detect abusive traffic without any user friction. This type of service collects and analyses your device and behaviour data, potentially containing your personal data, with the purpose of filtering it from parts of traffic, messages and content that are recognised as SPAM. In doing so, Google reCAPTCHA enables us to provide services through the Website, comply with our legal obligations, respond to enforcement requests, protect our and your respective rights and interests, and detect any malicious or fraudulent activity.
Google reCAPTCHA is a SPAM protection service provided by Google Ireland Limited. The use of reCAPTCHA is subject to the Google privacy policy and terms of use. Personal Data processed: Cookies; Usage Data. Usage Data is collected automatically. Place of processing: Ireland – privacy policy. Privacy Shield participant.
Google +
If you use a '+1' link on Reed.co.uk to share content on Google +, Google sets a cookie to remember that you've already shared this information.
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.google.co.uk/intl/en/policies/privacy/
Facebook
If you use a 'like' or 'send' link on Reed.co.uk to share content on Facebook, Facebook sets a cookie to remember that you've already shared this information.
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
Facebook Custom Audience
This is a feature that enables Reed to capture anonymized data from individuals who are registered users of both Reed.co.uk and Facebook. This data is transmitted and stored by Facebook's servers in the United States. This data captures information about your browsing history and patterns through the reed.co.uk website. When you browse the reed.co.uk website and then visit your Facebook account your browsing history on the reed.co.uk website shall be used to provide you with suitable targeted advertising on your Facebook page. This data is stored for 180 days; if you do not visit the reed.co.uk website for 180 days such data shall be removed unless you revisit the reed.co.uk website during this time.
Flash
Adobe flash player is used to display some advertising content on Reed.co.uk, and may drop flash cookies in your browser to allow the adverts to display correctly
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.adobe.com/products/flashplayer/security
Doubleclick
Doubleclick 'Spotlight Tags' report on the success of marketing campaigns for Reed.co.uk
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.doubleclick.com/privacy/dart_adserving.aspx
Criteo
Criteo is a partner that we use to help us advertise by placing banners on various websites. Criteo places Cookies to help us measure the effectiveness of an advertising campaign.
Criteo may also use Cookies to display relevant offers (such as recommendations of products that you might be interested in) when you visit other websites. Please
click here
to visit the Criteo privacy policy.
Ad serving
The advertisements on Reed.co.uk are managed by a number of third party ad serving partners, including specific media, media mind, the exchange lab, and adnetik amongst others. These partners use cookies to monitor the impact of their clients advertising campaigns and to target adverts to you based on your browsing patterns and behaviour online.
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.specificmedia.co.uk/privacy
http://www.sizmek.com/en/privacy-policy/
http://www.theexchangelab.com/privacy-policy/
http://adnetik.com/privacy-policy/
Kenshoo
Kenshoo tags report on the success of marketing campaigns for Reed.co.uk.
To reject these cookies:
http://kenshoo.com/privacy-policy/
RTB house
RTB house uses cookies to single out users and then personalize ads based on their browsing experience. To learn more or opt out of RTB House
click here
Bannerflow
Information is used in order for Reed.co.uk and its partners to be more relevant in its marketing, for example allowing personalised, more appropriate banners to be displayed, based on a user's behaviour on the site. This collects information on the user's browsing, for example pages viewed or products seen.
For more information on Bannerflow cookies and to opt-out see:
https://www.bannerflow.com/cookies
Aimwel
Aimwel is a partner that we use to help us advertise by placing ads on different websites. Aimwel places Cookies to help us measure the effectiveness of an advertising campaign
Cookies on third party sites
When you apply for jobs on Reed.co.uk, sometimes you'll be redirected to an external site to complete your application. These external sites may use cookies, which will not be included in the lists above.
How can I manage my cookies on Reed.co.uk?
If you wish to stop accepting cookies, you can do so through the Privacy Settings option in your browser.
Please be aware that by not accepting cookies you will not be able to use some of the key functions of Reed.co.uk, including:
Registering with Reed.co.uk
Signing in to Reed.co.uk
Applying for jobs on Reed.co.uk
To delete all cookies stored by Reed.co.uk for your browser, please click on the button below:
Clear Reed.co.uk cookies
Clicking this button will sign you out from Reed.co.uk.
Mobile App Terms and Conditions
The following terms and conditions apply if you access our services via the Reed.co.uk Mobile App.
Each time you access this mobile device application ("App"), you are deemed to accept these terms and conditions.
"we" means Reed Online Ltd, and "our" shall be construed accordingly. "you" means the person firm company or organisation browsing and/or using the App, and "your" shall be construed accordingly. "Reed Corporate Family" means all companies connected with us. A company is connected with us if it is: (i) a subsidiary or holding company of us; (ii) controlled by the same person(s) who control us or our holding company; (iii) a subsidiary or holding company of any company in (i) or (ii) above; or (iv) in the same group as any company under (i), (ii) or (iii) above. "subsidiary" and "holding company" shall be as defined in section 1159 of the Companies Act 2006. The term "control" shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 416 of the Income and Corporation Taxes Act 1988. Two companies are in the same group if they share the same ultimate holding company.
Interruptions and Omissions in Service
Whilst we try to ensure that the standard of the App remains high and to maintain the continuity of it, the internet is not an inherently stable medium, and errors, omissions, interruptions of service and delays may occur at any time. We do not accept any liability arising from any such errors, omissions, interruptions or delays or any ongoing obligation or responsibility to operate the App (or any particular part of it) or to provide the service offered on the App. We may vary the specification of the App from time to time without notice.
Links to other Sites
On this App you will be offered automatic links to external websites which we hope will be of interest to you. We do not accept any responsibility for or liability in respect of the content of those sites, the owners of which do not necessarily have any connection, commercial or otherwise, with us. Using automatic links to gain access to such sites is entirely at your own risk.
Information on this App
Whilst we make every effort to ensure that the information on our App is accurate and complete, some of the information is supplied to us by third parties and we are not able to check the accuracy or completeness of that information. We do not accept any liability arising from any inaccuracy or omission in any of the information on our App or any liability in respect of information on the App supplied by you, any other App user or any other person.
Your Use of this App
You may only use the App for lawful purposes when seeking employment or help with your career. You must not under any circumstances seek to undermine the security of the App or any information submitted to or available through it. In particular, but without limitation, you must not seek to access, alter or delete any information to which you do not have authorised access, seek to overload the system via spamming or flooding, take any action or use any device, routine or software to crash, delay, damage or otherwise interfere with the operation of the App or attempt to decipher, disassemble or modify any of the software, coding or information comprised in the App.
You are solely responsible for any information submitted by you to the App. You are responsible for ensuring that all information supplied by you is true, accurate, up-to-date and not misleading or likely to mislead or deceive and that it is not discriminatory, obscene, offensive, defamatory or otherwise illegal, unlawful or in breach of any applicable legislation, regulations, guidelines or codes of practice or the copyright, trademark or other intellectual property rights of any person in any jurisdiction. You are also responsible for ensuring that all information, data and files are free of viruses or other routines or engines that may damage or interfere with any system or data prior to being submitted to the App. We reserve the right to remove any information supplied by you from the App at our sole discretion, at any time and for any reason without being required to give any explanation.
Information Submitted by You
We will and/or the Reed Corporate Family will use information supplied by you to aid the recruitment process and associated administrative functions made through this App. We will process any data which you provide in completing the online registration or application forms and any further forms, assessments or personal details which you complete or provide to us when using the App in accordance with relevant data protection legislation. We explain more about your personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please note that all Third Party recruitment agencies have agreed to our Terms and Conditions and should they be found to be in breach of the Terms and Conditions, they will be prevented from using our services.
Further details of our client terms and conditions
.
Transfer outside the EEA: Personal information comprising your CV may be accessed through the Reed.co.uk database by third parties outside the European Economic Area ("EEA"). This could happen for instance if you apply for a vacancy where the employer is based outside the EEA.
Terms of Business
Recruitment: Each employment assignment or placement arising as a result of an introduction made by Reed will be subject to our standard Terms of Business as they are applicable in the circumstances. All prospective employers and clients for whom we arrange assignments or placements will be provided with a copy of the Terms of Business applicable to them at or following registration. Separate terms and conditions also apply to the use of our Recruiter site.
Content Rights
The rights in material on the App are protected by international copyright, software and trademark laws and you agree to use the App in a way which does not infringe these rights. You may copy material on the App for your own private or domestic purposes, but no copying for any commercial or business use is permitted.
Security and Passwords
In order to register with the App and to sign in when you visit the App you will need to use a username and password. You are solely responsible for the security and proper use of your password, which should be kept confidential at all times and not disclosed to any other person. You must notify us immediately if you believe that your password is known to someone else or if it may be used in an unauthorised way. We accept no liability for any unauthorised or improper use or disclosure of any password.
Termination
We may terminate your registration and/or deny you access to the App or any part of it (including any services, goods or information available on or through the App) at any time in our absolute discretion and without any explanation or notification.
Liability
We accept no liability for any loss (whether direct or indirect, for loss of business, revenue or profits, wasted expenditure, corruption or destruction of data or for any other indirect or consequential loss whatsoever) arising from your use of the App and we hereby exclude any such liability, whether in contract, tort (including for negligence) or otherwise. We hereby exclude all representations, warranties and conditions relating to the App and your use of it to the maximum extent permitted by law.
You agree to indemnify us and keep us indemnified against all costs, expenses, claims, losses, liabilities or proceedings arising from use or misuse by you of the App.
You must notify us immediately if anyone makes or threatens to make any claim against you relating to your use of the App.
Choice of Law and Jurisdiction
The use of the App and any agreements entered into through the App are to be governed by and construed in accordance with English law. The courts of England are to have exclusive jurisdiction to settle any dispute arising out of or in connection with the use of the App or any agreement made through the App.
Some of the goods or services offered through the App may not be lawful or may otherwise not be permitted in certain countries outside the United Kingdom. If you attempt to order, receive, purchase or otherwise benefit from any such goods or services, we do not accept any liability for any losses suffered by you in using the App which you would not have suffered had you been accessing the App as a United Kingdom resident (including as a result of us being prevented from dealing with any application or enquiry by any law, regulation or other ruling applicable in any country).
Modern Slavery Act statement
We are committed to ensuring that there is no modern slavery or human trafficking in our supply chains or in any part of our business. For our full Modern Slavery Act statement, please
click here
.
Changes to Terms and Conditions and Invalidity
These terms and conditions may be changed by us at any time. You will be deemed to accept the terms and conditions (as amended) when you next use the App following any amendment.
If any provision of these terms and conditions is held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions, which shall remain in full force and effect.
Registered Office
Reed Online Ltd
Academy Court
94 Chancery Lane
London
WC2A 1DT
Company Number 6317279. Registered in the UK.
Mobile App Privacy policy
The following privacy policy applies if you access our services via the Reed.co.uk Mobile App.
The App is operated by Reed Online Limited. We are part of the Reed Corporate Family.
This privacy policy explains how we use the personal information we collect about you when you use the App.
What we do
Registration with and use of the App for job seekers is free. When you register as a job seeker, you engage with us to provide you with online recruitment services. The service includes providing you with regular bespoke updates of relevant vacancies which may be of interest to you. These updates will be provided as job alerts which we will email to you (or send by SMS messaging where relevant). Job alerts may provide details of vacancies of third-parties and when you express an interest in any of these third-party job alerts by clicking on the relevant link in the emails, you may be taken directly to the website of the third-party provider without the need to log into your Reed account first.
If you do not want to receive that information from us, we give you the opportunity to opt out both as part of the registration process and at any time by updating your contact preferences in your account or by clicking on the "unsubscribe" link within those emails.
Lawful basis for processing of your personal data
Legitimate Interest:
We process your personal data when it is in our legitimate interests to do this in order to provide our services. Our legitimate interests include (but are not limited to) the following: introducing of job seekers and those interested in courses to recruiters and course providers; transmission of job alerts and course alerts; the measures we take in order to ensure the security and integrity of the services we provide; promoting, marketing and advertising of our products and services; analysis of our users' behaviour, activities, preferences and requirements; understanding of existing products and services and the development of new products and services; the handling of customer contacts, queries and complaints; making available the services through the App to our users; the sharing of personal data with our third party suppliers (e.g. communication providers) who act as our data processors to enable us to provide our services; the provision of your contact details, name, IP Address, country of residence and payment confirmation (if relevant) to any course providers where you purchase a course through the Website. Where you only make an inquiry into a course available through the Website, we will only process your personal data as required on the inquiry form.
Consent:
On some occasions, we may process your personal data with your consent. When your consent is required, we will clearly indicate this (e.g. when we share your CV with external CV review partners). You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. When you do so, we will cease to process such data.
The processing is required under legal obligation:
We may process your personal data to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation e.g. detecting, preventing or investigating crime or fraud including working with law enforcement agencies.
What Information do we collect about you?
The personal information we collect about you may include the following:
The information set out in your CV,
Information to enable us to provide our services e.g. your date of birth and location, your preferred job location and the kind of work you are interested in,
General identification and contact information e.g. your name, IP address, residential address, email and telephone details,
Marketing preferences,
Statistical information e.g. aggregate statistical information about site visits,
We collect the personal data about you when you register with us. We do so in order to provide you with the recruitment services as well as for administrative purposes when you purchase or enquire about courses available through the Website. We also collect your personal data on behalf of our sister company, Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited who provides services similar to ours. Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited will process your personal data in accordance with their own Privacy Notice which can be found
here
.
If you decide to upload a CV, cover letter, personal statement or other similar document or information we will keep that information for as long as you want to keep your account with us.
If you decide to purchase any courses through the Website you will be directed to either the Course Provider directly, or to a third-party payment provider (e.g Sagepay, Paypal, Dividebuy) to complete payment.
If you choose to take any assessments available through the Website, we will also maintain a record of your responses to and results of those assessments.
If you register for career advice, we only require your name and email address.
What do we do with your personal data?
Job Seekers:
By registering with the Website, it is understood that job seekers are actively soliciting contact from prospective employers and recruiters about opportunities which match the job seekers' fields of interest as well as relevant courses which may improve a job seeker's career prospects. If you are a job seeker, we will therefore make your personal data available to recruiters and employers who use our services to find suitable employees for specific roles that they are seeking to fill.
Although the primary purpose of the Website is to allow job seekers, prospective employers and recruiters to find each other, job seekers have the ability to control the extent to which your personal data is shared with other recruiters and prospective employers through the contact preferences section of the "your account" section on the App.
For job seekers, we will use your personal data to supply you with the recruitment services that we provide including job alerts, to manage your account and to provide you with information about our recruitment services
Course Seekers:
If you register with the Website because you have an interest in the courses advertised through it, your details will be used to provide you with course alerts, to manage your account, to put you in touch with the relevant third party course providers and facilitate payment for the course (where relevant), to provide the course to you if the course is provided by us, to provide you with courses information that is relevant to your field of interest and to contact you to provide feedback on our services.
If you do want to receive that information from us, we give you the opportunity to opt out both as part of the registration process and at any time by updating your contact preferences in your account or by clicking on the "unsubscribe" link within those emails.
Marketing
From time to time, we would like to tell you more about our other goods and services. We will do this by sending you marketing emails if you subscribe to them when you sign up to use our services (by ticking the relevant box where indicated). You can subsequently unsubscribe by clicking the unsubscribe link in every subsequent marketing email.
You can also amend the contact preferences in your account at any time to stop us from contacting you in connection with the recruitment services or courses available through the App and our Website, including job alerts for which you register when you set up your account as well as course alerts you may elect to receive upon registration.
Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited may also send you marketing information relating to the services it provides and which may be of interest to you. You have the right to opt out of receiving such marketing information at any time.
We use tracking pixels in our marketing emails. These pixels provide us with information in relation to your interaction with the emails (e.g. if you opened the email). This information helps us to better understand how customers engage with our content and to analyse the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns. You can disable tracking pixels by changing your email settings to block the loading or display of external images.
Data Sharing and Transfers
Job seekers:
As part of the recruitment services we provide to help you find a suitable job, we may make your personal data available to third parties such as recruiters, direct employers and their agents or other business partners. We attempt to verify the identity of these third parties when they sign up with us, however we do not make any warranties as to their authenticity. This would normally happen when you apply for a job through the Website or when a recruiter downloads your CV as part of the services they purchase from us. These parties will also be data controllers of your personal data. The amount of personal data we share with these parties depends on the options you select when you create or update your account. We will also share your personal data with our sister company, Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited, for the reasons set out in this privacy notice.
Courses:
When you purchase or enquire about a course available through the Website, we will make your personal data available to the course provider to enable it to provide the course to you. The course provider will be a data controller in relation to your personal data.
All users:
We may share your personal data with third party service providers who assist us in carrying out our business activities. These third parties act as our data processors and are bound by strict contractual provisions to only process your personal data under our instructions and for the limited purposes we permit them. These third parties include (but are not limited to) our accountants; auditors; external legal advisors; external IT providers; support and hosting service providers; printing, advertising, marketing and market research and analysis service providers, technical engineers, data storage and cloud providers and all other outsourced service providers (such as communication providers) that assist us in the provision of our services.
We may also share your personal data with courts, tribunals, regulators and other governmental and public authorities (such as the police or tax authorities) to: (i) allow us to pursue legal remedies, (ii) to enforce our terms and conditions and protect our operations, (iii) to comply with legal process, (iv) to comply with applicable law, and (v) to respond to requests from public and governmental bodies.
Your personal data is stored on our servers which are in the European Economic Area. Your personal data may be processed outside the EEA where you apply for a job advertised by a recruiter outside the EEA, where such a recruiter downloads your CV, or where you purchase a course from a course provider outside the EEA. In such situations, we enter into legally binding contracts with such recruiters and course providers to aim to ensure that your personal data is protected.
Access to your information and correction
We want to make sure that your information is accurate and up-to-date and will delete or amend any information that you think is inaccurate. Should you wish to delete your account please
contact us via the online form
. Amendments to your account can be made online by
signing in to your account
or by
contacting us
.
We aim to provide you with useful work-related services for the whole of your career. However, you have the right to close your account at any time and have us delete all of your personal information unless we are in the process of responding to any complaint that you make.
Strictly necessary technology
These technologies help our website and App run smoothly and are strictly necessary to provide certain essential features, such as being able to submit forms. You can set your device to block or alert you about these technologies, but some parts of the app will not then work. They aren't used to store any personal information.
Functional technology
These technologies help us provide more personalised service. They're based on previous choices a user has made, which help improve their experience on the app. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our app. If you do not allow these SDKs then some or all of these services may not function properly (e.g. remembering preferred language options, push notifications, in-app messages).
Performance & analytical technology
These technologies provide anonymous information on pages visited. They also allow us to analyse user behaviour, enabling us to improve app performance and provide the right amount of support when required.
Advertising technology
These technologies use your data to allow us to analyse how you installed our app to better support your experience.
Third-party service providers
We will use the services of third parties to compile reports and to help improve the App;
Firebase Analytics
We use these services to collects usage and behaviour data on your device called log data, that this may include the device IP address, device name, operating system version, the configuration of the Software, the time and date of any use of the Software, the screens you visit and other statistics;
We also use these services to monitor the performance of the App to help track, prioritise, and fix stability issues.
The information is collected in a way that does not directly identify you;
Google's overview of privacy and safeguarding data is available here
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Google Analytics
Google Tag Manager
Appsflyer
Appsflyer is a partner we use to help us measure the effectiveness of our campaigns to promote the App.
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/
Braze
We use Braze to send communications to you and measure their effectiveness.
https://www.braze.com/privacy
Other websites
This App contains links to other websites and apps. This privacy policy only applies to this App, so when you link to other websites you should review their own privacy policies.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
We keep our privacy policy under regular review and we place any updates on this web page. This policy was last updated on 16 June 2021.
How to contact us
Please contact us if you have any questions about our privacy policy or information we hold about you:
by email
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
or write to us at Data Protection Officer, Reed Online Limited, Academy Court, 94 Chancery Lane, London, WC2A 1DT.
How do you remove your name from the database?
You can
contact us
to request for your account to be closed at any time, which will be confirmed by Reed.
How do you unsubscribe from future mailings?
If you have a reed.co.uk jobseeker account, you can stop receiving emails by
updating your contact preferences
.
If you have a Reed.co.uk jobseeker account, you can stop receiving marketing emails by
updating your contact preferences
.
If you have a Reed.co.uk jobseeker account, you can stop receiving emails by
updating your contact preferences
.
How can you obtain information held about you?
You have the right to request a copy of the information that we hold about you. If you would like a copy of some or all of your personal information please email us at
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
.
Complaints
If you would like to make a complaint about how your information is being used by us, or how your complaint has been handled, you have the right to lodge a complaint directly with the Information Commissioner's Office or our Data Protection Officer. You can write to us at
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
, or to the Information Commissioner's Office at: Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF (or by email to
casework@ico.org.uk
).
Registered Office
Reed Online Ltd
Academy Court
94 Chancery Lane
London
WC2A 1DT
Company Number 6317279. Registered in the UK.
Your security on reed.co.uk
At reed.co.uk, we're committed to helping you find the right job in a safe and secure environment.
Your security on reed.co.uk
Your security on Reed.co.uk
At Reed.co.uk, we're committed to helping you find the right job in a safe and secure environment.
On our website, www.Reed.co.uk, you can learn more about some of the most common internet security threats, what you can do to protect yourself, and what we do to ensure your details remain secure.Website
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy
Your security
Cookies
Mobile app
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy
Policies
Website Terms and Conditions
The following terms and conditions apply if you access our services via a web browser. To view the terms and conditions for the Mobile App please
go here
Each time you access or use
www.Reed.co.uk
and/or our mobile device application (collectively the "Website"), you are deemed to accept these terms and conditions.
"we" means Reed Online Ltd, and "our" shall be construed accordingly. "you" means the person, firm, company or organisation browsing and/or using the Website, and "your" shall be construed accordingly. "Reed Corporate Family" means all companies connected with us. A company is connected with us if it is: (i) a subsidiary or holding company of us; (ii) controlled by the same person(s) who control us or our holding company; (iii) a subsidiary or holding company of any company in (i) or (ii) above; or (iv) in the same group as any company under (i), (ii) or (iii) above. "subsidiary" and "holding company" shall be as defined in section 1159 of the Companies Act 2006. The term "control" shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 416 of the Income and Corporation Taxes Act 1988. Two companies are in the same group if they share the same ultimate holding company.
Interruptions and Omissions in Service
Whilst we try to ensure that the standard of the Website remains high and to maintain the continuity of it, the internet is not an inherently stable medium, and errors, omissions, interruptions of service and delays may occur at any time. We do not accept any liability arising from any such errors, omissions, interruptions or delays or any ongoing obligation or responsibility to operate the Website (or any particular part of it) or to provide the service offered on the Website. We may vary the specification of this site from time to time without notice.
Links to other Sites
On this site you will be offered automatic links to other sites which we hope will be of interest to you. We do not accept any responsibility for or liability in respect of the content of those sites, the owners of which do not necessarily have any connection, commercial or otherwise, with us. Using automatic links to gain access to such sites is entirely at your own risk.
Information on this Site
Whilst we make every effort to ensure that the information on our Website is accurate and complete, some of the information is supplied to us by third parties and we are not able to check the accuracy or completeness of that information. We do not accept any liability arising from any inaccuracy or omission in any of the information on our Website or any liability in respect of information on the Website supplied by you, any other website user or any other person.
Your Use of this Site
You may only use the Website for lawful purposes when seeking employment or help with your career, when purchasing training courses or when recruiting staff. You must not under any circumstances seek to undermine the security of the Website or any information submitted to or available through it. In particular, but without limitation, you must not seek to access, alter or delete any information to which you do not have authorised access, seek to overload the system via spamming or flooding, take any action or use any device, routine or software to crash, delay, damage or otherwise interfere with the operation of the Website or attempt to decipher, disassemble or modify any of the software, coding or information comprised in the Website.
You are solely responsible for any information submitted by you to the Website. You are responsible for ensuring that all information supplied by you is true, accurate, up-to-date and not misleading or likely to mislead or deceive and that it is not discriminatory, obscene, offensive, defamatory or otherwise illegal, unlawful or in breach of any applicable legislation, regulations, guidelines or codes of practice or the copyright, trademark or other intellectual property rights of any person in any jurisdiction. You are also responsible for ensuring that all information, data and files are free of viruses or other routines or engines that may damage or interfere with any system or data prior to being submitted to the Website. We reserve the right to remove any information supplied by you from the Website at our sole discretion, at any time and for any reason without being required to give any explanation.
Information Submitted by You
We will and/or the Reed Corporate Family will use information supplied by you to aid the recruitment process and associated administrative functions as well as to facilitate the purchase of training courses made through this website. We will process any data which you provide in completing the online registration or application forms and any further forms, assessments or personal details which you complete or provide to us when using the Website in accordance with relevant data protection legislation. We explain more about your personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please note that all Third Party recruitment agencies have agreed to our Terms and Conditions and should they be found to be in breach of the Terms and Conditions, they will be prevented from using our services.
Further details of our client terms and conditions
.
Transfer outside the EEA: Personal information comprising your CV or contact details may be accessed through the Reed.co.uk database by third parties outside the European Economic Area ("EEA"). This could happen for instance if you apply for a vacancy where the employer is based outside the EEA or where you purchase a training course from a course provider who operates from outside the EEA.
Terms of Business
Recruitment:  All prospective employers and clients will be provided with applicable terms and conditions before they can access the services we make available through the Website.
Training Courses: Any training course purchased through this website will be subject to the terms issued by the course providers. If you are using DivideBuy to spread the cost of your course some different terms apply. Please see
DivideBuy's terms
and
FAQs
for more details.
DivideBuy are an independent payment provider and Reed has no influence over whether your payment with DivideBuy is accepted or not. If you have any trouble with your order, please contact
DivideBuy Customer Service
.
Content Rights
The rights in material on the Website are protected by international copyright, software and trademark laws and you agree to use the Website in a way which does not infringe these rights. You may copy material on the Website for your own private or domestic purposes, but no copying for any commercial or business use is permitted.
Security and Passwords
In order to register with the Website and to sign in when you visit the Website, you will need to use a username and password. You are solely responsible for the security and proper use of your password, which should be kept confidential at all times and not disclosed to any other person. You must notify us immediately if you believe that your password is known to someone else or if it may be used in an unauthorised way. We accept no liability for any unauthorised or improper use or disclosure of any password.
Termination
We may terminate your registration and/or deny you access to the Website or any part of it (including any services, goods or information available on or through the Website) at any time in our absolute discretion and without any explanation or notification.
Liability
We accept no liability for any loss (whether direct or indirect, for loss of business, revenue or profits, wasted expenditure, corruption or destruction of data or for any other indirect or consequential loss whatsoever) arising from your use of the Website and we hereby exclude any such liability, whether in contract, tort (including for negligence) or otherwise. We hereby exclude all representations, warranties and conditions relating to the Website and your use of it to the maximum extent permitted by law.
You agree to indemnify us and keep us indemnified against all costs, expenses, claims, losses, liabilities or proceedings arising from use or misuse by you of the Website.
You must notify us immediately if anyone makes or threatens to make any claim against you relating to your use of the Website.
Choice of Law and Jurisdiction
The use of the Website and any agreements entered into through the Website are to be governed by and construed in accordance with English law. The courts of England are to have exclusive jurisdiction to settle any dispute arising out of or in connection with the use of the Website or any agreement made through the Website.
Some of the goods or services offered through the Website may not be lawful or may otherwise not be permitted in certain countries outside the United Kingdom. If you attempt to order, receive, purchase or otherwise benefit from any such goods or services, we do not accept any liability for any losses suffered by you in using the Website which you would not have suffered had you been accessing the Website as a United Kingdom resident (including as a result of us being prevented from dealing with any application or enquiry by any law, regulation or other ruling applicable in any country).
Modern Slavery Act statement
We are committed to ensuring that there is no modern slavery or human trafficking in our supply chains or in any part of our business. For our full Modern Slavery Act statement, please
click here
.
Changes to Terms and Conditions and Invalidity
These terms and conditions may be changed by us at any time. You will be deemed to accept the terms and conditions (as amended) when you next use the Website following any amendment.
If any provision of these terms and conditions is held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions, which shall remain in full force and effect.
Registered Office
Reed Online Ltd
Academy Court
94 Chancery Lane
London
WC2A 1DT
Company Number 6317279. Registered in the UK.
Website Privacy policy
The following privacy policy applies if you access our services via a web browser. To view the privacy policy for the Mobile App please
go here
.
www.Reed.co.uk
("the Website") is a job site operated by Reed Online Limited. We are part of the REED Corporate Family
This privacy policy explains how we use the personal information we collect about you when you use the Website.
If you register on the Website as a recruiter or course provider and provide us with personal data, we will process such personal data on the basis that it is necessary to do so in order to perform the contract you enter into with us. We may also contact you via email to invite you to review any services and/or products you received from us in order to collect your feedback and improve our services and products (the "Purpose"). We use an external company, Trustpilot A/S ("Trustpilot"), to collect your feedback which means that we will share your name, email address and reference number with Trustpilot for the Purpose. The lawful basis for sharing personal data with Trustpilot for the Purpose is to pursue our legitimate interest. Trustpilot acts as our data processor and will not use your personal data for any reason other than the Purpose. If you want to read more about how Trustpilot will process your data, you can find their Privacy Policy
here
. This policy is of particular relevance should you decide to open an account with Trustpilot.
What we do
Registration with and use of the Website for job seekers and those looking to purchase courses or receive career advice is free. When you register as a job seeker, you engage with us to provide you with online recruitment services. The service includes providing you with regular bespoke updates of relevant vacancies and relevant courses which may be of interest to you. These updates will be provided as job alerts and course alerts which we will email to you (or send by SMS messaging where relevant). Job alerts and course alerts may provide details of vacancies and courses of third-party providers and when you express an interest in any of these third-party job alerts or course alerts by clicking on the relevant link in the emails, you may be taken directly to the website of our third-party providers without the need to log into your Reed account first.
If you do not want to receive that information from us, we give you the opportunity to opt out both as part of the registration process and at any time by updating your contact preferences in your account or by clicking on the "unsubscribe" link within those emails.
Lawful basis for processing of your personal data
Legitimate Interest:
We process your personal data when it is in our legitimate interests to do this in order to provide our services. Our legitimate interests include (but are not limited to) the following: introducing of job seekers and those interested in courses to recruiters and course providers; transmission of job alerts and course alerts; the measures we take in order to ensure the security and integrity of the services we provide; promoting, marketing and advertising of our products and services; analysis of our users’ behaviour, activities, preferences and requirements; understanding of existing products and services and the development of new products and services; the handling of customer contacts, queries and complaints; making available the services through the Website to our users (providers of courses, recruiters, job seekers and those intending to buy course or those just expressing an interest in learning more about the products offered by us; the sharing of personal data with our third party suppliers (e.g. communication providers) who act as our data processors to enable us to provide our services; the provision of your contact details, name, IP Address, country of residence and payment confirmation (if relevant) to any course providers where you purchase a course through the Website. Where you only make an inquiry into a course available through the Website, we will only process your personal data as required on the inquiry form.
Consent:
On some occasions, we may process your personal data with your consent. When your consent is required, we will clearly indicate this (e.g. when we share your CV with external CV review partners). You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. When you do so, we will cease to process such data.
The processing is required under legal obligation:
We may process your personal data to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation e.g. detecting, preventing or investigating crime or fraud including working with law enforcement agencies.
What Information do we collect about you?
The personal information we collect about you may include the following:
The information set out in your CV,
Information to enable us to provide our services e.g. your date of birth and location, your preferred job location and the kind of work you are interested in,
General identification and contact information e.g. your name, IP address, residential address, email and telephone details,
Marketing preferences,
Statistical information e.g. aggregate statistical information about site visits,
We collect the personal data about you when you register with the Website. We do so in order to provide you with the recruitment services that are available through the Website as well as for administrative purposes when you purchase or enquire about courses available through the Website. We also collect your personal data on behalf of our sister company, Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited who provides services similar to ours. Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited will process your personal data in accordance with their own Privacy Notice which can be found
here
. If you decide to upload a CV, cover letter, personal statement or other similar document or information we will keep that information for as long as you want to keep your account with the Website.
If you decide to purchase any courses through the Website you will be directed to either the Course Provider directly, or to a third-party payment provider (e.g Sagepay, Paypal, Dividebuy) to complete payment.
If you choose to take any assessments available through the Website, we will also maintain a record of your responses to and results of those assessments.
If you register for career advice, we only require your name and email address.
What do we do with your personal data?
Job Seekers:
By registering with the Website, it is understood that job seekers are actively soliciting contact from prospective employers and recruiters about opportunities which match the job seekers’ fields of interest as well as relevant courses which may improve a job seeker’s career prospects. If you are a job seeker, we will therefore make your personal data available to recruiters and employers who use the Website to find suitable employees for specific roles that they are seeking to fill and also provide you with course alerts informing you of relevant courses which may be of interest to you.
Although the primary purpose of the Website is to allow job seekers, prospective employers and recruiters to find each other, job seekers have the ability to control the extent to which your personal data is shared with other recruiters and prospective employers through the contact preferences section of the "your account" section on the Website.
For job seekers, we will use your personal data to supply you with the recruitment services that we provide including job alerts and course alerts, to manage your account and to provide you with information about our recruitment services as well as ancillary services available through the Website.
Course Seekers
If you are registering with the Website because you have an interest in the courses advertised through it, your details will be used to provide you with course alerts, to manage your account, to put you in touch with the relevant third party course providers and facilitate payment for the course (where relevant), to provide the course to you if the course is provided by us, to provide you with courses information that is relevant to your field of interest and to contact you to provide feedback on our services.
If you do want to receive that information from us, we give you the opportunity to opt out both as part of the registration process and at any time by updating your contact preferences in your account or by clicking on the "unsubscribe" link within those emails.
Candidates who register for Career Advice only:
If you register for career advice, we will only communicate with you to provide career advice, access to career advice and in connection with related services. This advice will normally consist of a monthly newsletter. You have the right to opt out of receiving such communication from us at any time.
Marketing
From time to time, we would like to tell you more about the other goods and services available through the Website. We will do this by sending you marketing emails if you subscribe to them when you sign up to the website (by ticking the relevant box where indicated). You can subsequently unsubscribe by clicking the unsubscribe link in every subsequent marketing email.
You can also amend the contact preferences in your account at any time to stop us from contacting you in connection with the recruitment services or courses available through the Website, including job alerts and course alerts, for which you register when you set up your account.
Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited may also send you marketing information relating to the services it provides and which may be of interest to you. You have the right to opt out of receiving such marketing information at any time.
We use tracking pixels in our marketing emails. These pixels provide us with information in relation to your interaction with the emails (e.g. if you opened the email). This information helps us to better understand how customers engage with our content and to analyse the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns. You can disable tracking pixels by changing your email settings to block the loading or display of external images.
Data Sharing and Transfers
Job Seekers:
As part of the recruitment services we provide to help you find a suitable job, we may make your personal data available to third parties such as recruiters, direct employers and their agents or other business partners. We attempt to verify the identity of these third parties when they sign up with us, however we do not make any warranties as to their authenticity. This would normally happen when you apply for a job through the Website or when a recruiter downloads your CV as part of the services they purchase from us.  These parties will also be data controllers of your personal data. The amount of personal data we share with these parties depends on the options you select when you create or update your account. We will also share your personal data with our sister company, Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited, for the reasons set out in this privacy notice.
Courses:
When you purchase or enquire about a course available through the Website, we will make your personal data available to the course provider to enable it to provide the course to you. The course provider will be a data controller in relation to your personal data.
All users
We may share your personal data with third party service providers who assist us in carrying out our business activities. These third parties act as our data processors and are bound by strict contractual provisions to only process your personal data under our instructions and for the limited purposes we permit them. These third parties include (but are not limited to) our accountants; auditors; external legal advisors; external IT providers; support and hosting service providers; printing, advertising, marketing and market research and analysis service providers, technical engineers, data storage and cloud providers and all other outsourced service providers (such as communication providers) that assist us in the provision of our services.
We may also share your personal data with courts, tribunals, regulators and other governmental and public authorities (such as the police or tax authorities) to: (i) allow us to pursue legal remedies, (ii) to enforce our terms and conditions and protect our operations, (iii) to comply with legal process, (iv) to comply with applicable law, and (v) to respond to requests from public and governmental bodies.
Your personal data is stored on our servers which are in the European Economic Area. Your personal data may be processed outside the EEA where you apply for a job advertised by a recruiter outside the EEA, where such recruiter downloads your CV, or where you purchase a course from a course provider outside the EEA. In such situations, we enter into legally binding contracts with such recruiters and course providers to aim to ensure that your personal data is protected.
Access to your information and correction
We want to make sure that your information is accurate and up-to-date and will delete or amend any information that you think is inaccurate. Should you wish to delete your account please
contact us via the online form
. Amendments to your account can be made online by
signing in to your account
or by
contacting us
.
We aim to provide you with useful work-related services for the whole of your career. However, you have the right to close your account at any time and have us delete all of your personal information unless we are in the process of responding to any complaint that you make.
Cookies
Cookies are text files placed on your computer to collect standard internet log and visitor behaviour information. This information is used to track visitor use of the Website, to compile statistical reports on Website activity and to help us make recommendations that are relevant to you.
We also use third party advertising companies to serve ads when you visit the Website. Those companies may use information about your visits to this and other websites in order to provide you with advertisements about other goods and services that may be of interest to you.
If you would like more information about this practice, including how to prevent it, please visit
www.aboutcookies.org
,
www.allaboutcookies.org
or
optout.networkadvertising.org
More information about all of the cookies on the Website is available on our
cookies page
.
Other websites
Our Website contains links to other websites. This privacy policy only applies to this Website, so when you link to other websites you should review their own privacy policies.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
We keep our privacy policy under regular review and we place any updates on this web page. This policy was last updated on 16 June 2021.
How to contact us
Please contact us if you have any questions about our privacy policy or information we hold about you:
by email
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
or write to us at Data Protection Officer, Reed Online Limited, Academy Court, 94 Chancery Lane, London, WC2A 1DT.
How do you remove your name from the database?
You can
contact us
to request for your account to be closed at any time, which will be confirmed by Reed.
How do you unsubscribe from future mailings?
If you have a Reed.co.uk jobseeker account, you can stop receiving marketing emails by
updating your contact preferences
.
How can you obtain information held about you?
You have the right to request a copy of the information that we hold about you. If you would like a copy of some or all of your personal information please email us at
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
.
Complaints
If you would like to make a complaint about how your information is being used by us, or how your complaint has been handled, you have the right to lodge a complaint directly with the Information Commissioner’s Office or our Data Protection Officer. You can write to us at
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
, or to the Information Commissioner’s Office at: Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF (or by email to casework@ico.org,uk).
Registered Office
Reed Online Ltd
Academy Court
94 Chancery Lane
London
WC2A 1DT
Company Number 6317279. Registered in the UK.
Your security on Reed.co.uk
At Reed.co.uk, we're committed to helping you find the right job in a safe and secure environment.
On these pages, you can learn more about some of the most common internet security threats, what you can do to protect yourself, and what we do to ensure your details remain secure.
Common security threats
Money laundering:
Jobseekers are an increasingly common target for money laundering scam emails. Typically, these emails concern a job offer and the sender may claim to have found your details on a job site such as Reed.co.uk. They often offer job titles such as 'transaction manager' or 'accounts assistant'.
Money laundering scams usually have five key stages:
A jobseeker responds to a fake email job offer
The jobseeker is asked for their bank details
A cheque is paid into the jobseeker's bank account
The jobseeker is instructed to transfer a portion of the funds into another account (often via a money transfer service, such as Western Union or Moneygram) and keep the remainder as their payment
Once the jobseeker has transferred the money, the cheque bounces and the victim is left with the debt
Falling victim to a money laundering scam is not only distressing, it can also affect credit ratings and bring victims under suspicion of criminal activity.
However, there are a number of tell-tale signs to look out for to help you spot a potential money laundering scam:
Are you being offered an opportunity to work from home?
Usually, this type of scam email includes the offer of a great opportunity to work from home as a transaction processor or similar.
Is the salary offered realistic?
Usually, the fake jobs being offered in this type of scam offer an unrealistically high salary.
Are you being asked for bank details?
Money laundering scammers will ask you for your bank details. You should never give these out to a company you don't completely trust.
Do you have a personal contact?
In most money laundering scams, communication will be carried out entirely over email and/or instant messaging, with no telephone or face to face contact.
Are there spelling and grammar mistakes in the email?
Money laundering scam emails often originate from outside the UK and spelling and grammar mistakes are common.
If you're suspicious of any email you receive, please
contact us
including the subject line of the email you received, and the email address it was sent from.
Phishing:
Phishing emails are an increasingly common method used to try and gain access to personal details in order to carry out fraud or
identity theft
.
Typically, a phishing email will claim to have been sent by a reputable organisation and ask that you respond to the email with your username and/or password or that you enter your sign in details over a 'secure' connection.
Whilst phishing emails can seem very professional, there are usually a number of clues to alert you to the fraudulent nature of the emails. When reading an email claiming to be sent from Reed.co.uk, you should always keep the following questions in mind:
Are you being asked to provide your password?
Reed.co.uk will
never
ask you to provide your password in response to an email or phone call.
Are there spelling and grammar mistakes in the email?
Phishing emails often originate from outside the UK and spelling and grammar mistakes are common.
Are you being asked to download something?
If you don't recognise a file, don't download it. All Reed.co.uk account details are stored online, so we'll never ask you to download anything to use the service.
Are you being threatened with losing access to your account?
Phishing emails sometimes make it seem like you'll lose access to your account unless you download something or provide your sign in details. Reed.co.uk will never ask you to do anything like this in order to keep your account open.
If you're suspicious of any email you receive from Reed.co.uk, please
contact us
with the subject line of the email, and the email address it was sent from.
Spoofing:
Spoofing occurs when a criminal creates an exact copy of a website in order to make a fraudulent company look legitimate. A spoofed website will usually look exactly the same as the website of a legitimate company, but with a slightly different web address (e.g., '.biz' instead of '.com' or '.co.uk'). If you're suspicious of any website you're directed to as a result of your dealings with Reed.co.uk, please
contact us
and we'll investigate.
Identity theft
Identity theft occurs when an individual steals personal details from someone else, and uses the information to fraudulently impersonate that individual. Victims of identity theft often find that their details are used to open bank accounts and obtain credit in their name.
Identity theft can only take place where a criminal has been able to gain access to enough personal details to create false documents in another person's name. In order to avoid becoming a victim of identity theft:
Never give out sensitive personal information such as your bank details, date of birth, National Insurance number or a copy of your passport in relation to an email
Look out for spelling and grammar mistakes in emails you receive
Never give out your sign in details in response to an email
If you suspect that you've been a victim of identity theft, you should contact the police as soon as possible. Details on how to report a fraud can be found
here
.
Stay safe with SAFERjobs
To stay safe in your job search we recommend that you visit SAFERjobs, a non-profit, joint industry and law enforcement organisation working to combat job scams. Visit the
SAFERjobs website
for information on common scams and to get free, expert advice for a safer job search.
What you can do to protect yourself
Account security
Online security risks can be minimised simply by ensuring that your password is always kept secure. We recommend you follow the password security advice below:
Always use a password which is personal and does not contain your name, email address or the word 'password'
Ensure your password contains both letters and numbers
Never give your password out to anyone - we will
never
ask you for your password
Change your password at least once every three months
Take a moment to memorise your password so you don't need to write it down
Try and use a different password for each different website you use
CV security
Uploading your CV to Reed.co.uk is an important part of the work finding process, and could help you to be headhunted for great roles. It's important you provide enough information on your CV for recruiters to contact you
However, in order to ensure your security online, you should never include any of the following in your CV:
National Insurance number
Driving license number
Bank details
Credit card details
Passwords
Date of birth
General advice
It's always important to be mindful of your security and safety online. Look at our top 10 tips to staying safe online to make sure you're not putting yourself at risk.
If it looks too good to be true, it probably is.
Be wary of offers for jobs paying a high salary for working from home.
Never provide personal details when looking for a job.
There's no need for a recruiter to request your bank details before you've been through the interview process and been offered a role.
Never agree to process funds through your personal bank account on behalf of a company.
Any legitimate company will have corporate accounts, so would never ask you to do this.
Never provide your personal details over a non-secure connection.
If you're being asked to enter login credentials, look for the "https://" at the beginning of the website address.
Don't put personal information on your CV.
Recruiters don't need to see your date of birth or national insurance number on your CV.
Look out for bad spelling and grammar.
Email scams often originate from outside the UK so may not contain perfect English.
Never provide your username and password in an email purporting to be from Reed.co.uk.
We'll never ask you to provide this information in an email.
Be wary of recruiters with no personal contact.
It's very unlikely that a recruiter would offer you a job without a telephone and/or face to face interview.
Keep your password secure and up-to-date.
Passwords should be changed at least once every three months and shouldn't contain your name, email address or the word 'password'.
If in doubt, report it.
If you're suspicious about any contact you receive related to Reed.co.uk,
contact us
and our Customer Support Team will investigate.
If you think you have been the victim of online fraud, we recommend you report it to Action Fraud, the national fraud and internet crime reporting centre, who will be able to advise you further.
You can contact Action Fraud on 0300 123 2040, or visit their website for advice
http://www.actionfraud.police.uk/
What we're doing to protect you
We've partnered with several industry leaders to ensure you receive the most secure levels of service possible whilst using the site.
Encryption
To protect your personal information Reed.co.uk uses industry standards such as TLS (Transport Layer Security) encryption to encrypt and secure your data.
Virus protection
Reed.co.uk automatically scans, detects, and quarantines new viruses, ensuring that all documents uploaded to or downloaded from Reed.co.uk, including your CV, are safe and virus-free.
Data
Reed.co.uk's servers are securely hosted and managed by
Ensono
, Europe's leading specialist in operating internet and enterprise applications. Attenda is ISO27001 accredited, the international standard for Information Security Management Systems (ISMS). In addition, Reed.co.uk works with
Westpoint Ltd
, who provide ongoing vulnerability assessment services and security monitoring of Reed.co.uk's servers.
Reed.co.uk cookies
What are cookies?
A cookie is a piece of information in the form of a very small text file that is placed on an internet user's computer. It is generated by a web page server (which is basically the computer that operates the web site) and can be used by that server whenever the user visits the site. A cookie can be thought of as an internet user's identification card, which tells a web site when the user has returned.
Cookies can't harm your computer and we don't store any personally identifiable information about you on any of our cookies.
Why do we use cookies on Reed.co.uk?
Reed.co.uk uses two types of cookies: cookies set by Reed.co.uk and cookies set by third parties (i.e. other websites or services).
Reed.co.uk cookies enable us to keep you signed in to your account throughout your visit and to tailor the information displayed on the site to your preferences, such as recommending jobs.
We also use third party cookies to help deliver relevant jobs, courses and advertising both on Reed.co.uk and on other websites, to integrate content with social networks, such as Facebook and Google+, and to better understand how the features and functions of the site are used in order that we can improve our service.
If you would like more information about the cookies we use, as well as details on how to opt-out, please see below.
What cookies do we use on Reed.co.uk?
Below is a list of the main cookies set by Reed.co.uk, and what each is used for:
Cookie name
Purpose
ReedRecentJobSearchs
Remembers the last ten searches you've run on Reed.co.uk and displays them on the homepage
ReedSavedJobs
Remembers any jobs you've saved when you're signed out of your account. When you sign in, the jobs are saved to your account and the cookie is deleted
ReedPageSize
Remembers the number of jobs per page you selected on search results and displays this on your next visit
Reed_ASP.NET_SessionId
Remembers your session — used to display 'back to search results' links and other session specific information
Reed.co.ukV10Auth
Keeps you signed in to your account once you've signed in
RequestVerificationToken_LW__
Provides security in requests and form submissions
LastSearchTime and NewJobsSinceTime
Used in conjunction to show you jobs that were added after you last used the site
UserLastSignedInDate
Used when your session has expired to know when we've logged you in automatically
LastEmailedSavedJobsTo
Used to remember and pre-fill the email address you most recently emailed a job to
LastSearchedLocation
Used to remember and pre-fill the most recent location you entered in a job search
Pardot
Gathers site activity data to better allow us to understand usage for sales purposes
ReedTestGroup
Allocates visitors to the site into a test group so we can test new journeys and features
Reed.Activity
Gathers site activity to enable targeting for advertising
Reed.co.ukFreecruitmentAuth
Keeps you signed in to your account, once you've signed in to Reed.co.uk/recruiter
reed.utmx
Contains information used for testing new journeys and features
NewJobsSinceTime
Remembers the last time a user ran a search so we can show jobs they haven't seen before
ReedJobSearch
Records last location searched for so the location can be prefilled when running a search.
cookieLegislation
Remembers we have shown users the Cookie banner
directRegWithCV
Records that a user has registered, then uploaded a CV. This is used to modify how the web page is displayed.
CourseBasketKey
Stores your basket key
CourseCompareKey
Stores your compare tool key
LinkSourceTracker
Stores your source
.AspNet.ApplicationCookie
Providers site sign in cookie
Cookies set by third parties
Reed.co.uk works with a number of third parties to provide services which help us to keep the website tailored to our users' needs. Some of these partners use cookies to help them deliver these services. A list of third party cookies can be found below:
Cookie name
Purpose
TinyMCE
Allows text to be pasted into the covering letter on job applications
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://tinymcesupport.com/privacy
Google Analytics
This website uses Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. ("Google"). Google Analytics uses "cookies", which are text files placed on your computer to help the website analyse how visitors use the site. The information generated by the cookie about your use of the website (including your IP address) will be transmitted to and stored by Google on servers in the United States . Google will use this information for the purpose of evaluating your use of the website, compiling reports on website activity for website operators and providing other services relating to website activity and internet usage. Google may also transfer this information to third parties where required to do so by law, or where such third parties process the information on Google's behalf. Google will not associate your IP address with any other data held by Google. You may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on your browser, however please note that if you do this you may not be able to use the full functionality of this website. By using this website, you consent to the processing of data about you by Google in the manner and for the purposes set out above.
To opt out of Google Analytics please go to the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
HotJar
HotJar cookies are used to remember whether you have taken part in a survey or poll.
To opt out of Hotjar please go to the following link:
https://www.hotjar.com/opt-out
Twitter
If you use a 'Tweet' link on Reed.co.uk to share content on twitter, twitter sets a cookie to remember that you've already shared this information.
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://twitter.com/privacy
. Twitter tags allow us to show relevant adverts on Twitter to users that have previously visited our website.
To reject these cookies:
https://support.twitter.com/articles/20170405%20
Google reCAPTCHA
(Google Ireland Limited)
We use Google reCAPTCHA which helps us detect abusive traffic without any user friction. This type of service collects and analyses your device and behaviour data, potentially containing your personal data, with the purpose of filtering it from parts of traffic, messages and content that are recognised as SPAM. In doing so, Google reCAPTCHA enables us to provide services through the Website, comply with our legal obligations, respond to enforcement requests, protect our and your respective rights and interests, and detect any malicious or fraudulent activity.
Google reCAPTCHA is a SPAM protection service provided by Google Ireland Limited. The use of reCAPTCHA is subject to the Google privacy policy and terms of use. Personal Data processed: Cookies; Usage Data. Usage Data is collected automatically. Place of processing: Ireland – privacy policy. Privacy Shield participant.
Google +
If you use a '+1' link on Reed.co.uk to share content on Google +, Google sets a cookie to remember that you've already shared this information.
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.google.co.uk/intl/en/policies/privacy/
Facebook
If you use a 'like' or 'send' link on Reed.co.uk to share content on Facebook, Facebook sets a cookie to remember that you've already shared this information.
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
Facebook Custom Audience
This is a feature that enables Reed to capture anonymized data from individuals who are registered users of both Reed.co.uk and Facebook. This data is transmitted and stored by Facebook's servers in the United States. This data captures information about your browsing history and patterns through the reed.co.uk website. When you browse the reed.co.uk website and then visit your Facebook account your browsing history on the reed.co.uk website shall be used to provide you with suitable targeted advertising on your Facebook page. This data is stored for 180 days; if you do not visit the reed.co.uk website for 180 days such data shall be removed unless you revisit the reed.co.uk website during this time.
Flash
Adobe flash player is used to display some advertising content on Reed.co.uk, and may drop flash cookies in your browser to allow the adverts to display correctly
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.adobe.com/products/flashplayer/security
Doubleclick
Doubleclick 'Spotlight Tags' report on the success of marketing campaigns for Reed.co.uk
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.doubleclick.com/privacy/dart_adserving.aspx
Criteo
Criteo is a partner that we use to help us advertise by placing banners on various websites. Criteo places Cookies to help us measure the effectiveness of an advertising campaign.
Criteo may also use Cookies to display relevant offers (such as recommendations of products that you might be interested in) when you visit other websites. Please
click here
to visit the Criteo privacy policy.
Ad serving
The advertisements on Reed.co.uk are managed by a number of third party ad serving partners, including specific media, media mind, the exchange lab, and adnetik amongst others. These partners use cookies to monitor the impact of their clients advertising campaigns and to target adverts to you based on your browsing patterns and behaviour online.
To reject or delete these cookies:
http://www.specificmedia.co.uk/privacy
http://www.sizmek.com/en/privacy-policy/
http://www.theexchangelab.com/privacy-policy/
http://adnetik.com/privacy-policy/
Kenshoo
Kenshoo tags report on the success of marketing campaigns for Reed.co.uk.
To reject these cookies:
http://kenshoo.com/privacy-policy/
RTB house
RTB house uses cookies to single out users and then personalize ads based on their browsing experience. To learn more or opt out of RTB House
click here
Bannerflow
Information is used in order for Reed.co.uk and its partners to be more relevant in its marketing, for example allowing personalised, more appropriate banners to be displayed, based on a user's behaviour on the site. This collects information on the user's browsing, for example pages viewed or products seen.
For more information on Bannerflow cookies and to opt-out see:
https://www.bannerflow.com/cookies
Aimwel
Aimwel is a partner that we use to help us advertise by placing ads on different websites. Aimwel places Cookies to help us measure the effectiveness of an advertising campaign
Cookies on third party sites
When you apply for jobs on Reed.co.uk, sometimes you'll be redirected to an external site to complete your application. These external sites may use cookies, which will not be included in the lists above.
How can I manage my cookies on Reed.co.uk?
If you wish to stop accepting cookies, you can do so through the Privacy Settings option in your browser.
Please be aware that by not accepting cookies you will not be able to use some of the key functions of Reed.co.uk, including:
Registering with Reed.co.uk
Signing in to Reed.co.uk
Applying for jobs on Reed.co.uk
To delete all cookies stored by Reed.co.uk for your browser, please click on the button below:
Clear Reed.co.uk cookies
Clicking this button will sign you out from Reed.co.uk.
Mobile App Terms and Conditions
The following terms and conditions apply if you access our services via the Reed.co.uk Mobile App.
Each time you access this mobile device application ("App"), you are deemed to accept these terms and conditions.
"we" means Reed Online Ltd, and "our" shall be construed accordingly. "you" means the person firm company or organisation browsing and/or using the App, and "your" shall be construed accordingly. "Reed Corporate Family" means all companies connected with us. A company is connected with us if it is: (i) a subsidiary or holding company of us; (ii) controlled by the same person(s) who control us or our holding company; (iii) a subsidiary or holding company of any company in (i) or (ii) above; or (iv) in the same group as any company under (i), (ii) or (iii) above. "subsidiary" and "holding company" shall be as defined in section 1159 of the Companies Act 2006. The term "control" shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 416 of the Income and Corporation Taxes Act 1988. Two companies are in the same group if they share the same ultimate holding company.
Interruptions and Omissions in Service
Whilst we try to ensure that the standard of the App remains high and to maintain the continuity of it, the internet is not an inherently stable medium, and errors, omissions, interruptions of service and delays may occur at any time. We do not accept any liability arising from any such errors, omissions, interruptions or delays or any ongoing obligation or responsibility to operate the App (or any particular part of it) or to provide the service offered on the App. We may vary the specification of the App from time to time without notice.
Links to other Sites
On this App you will be offered automatic links to external websites which we hope will be of interest to you. We do not accept any responsibility for or liability in respect of the content of those sites, the owners of which do not necessarily have any connection, commercial or otherwise, with us. Using automatic links to gain access to such sites is entirely at your own risk.
Information on this App
Whilst we make every effort to ensure that the information on our App is accurate and complete, some of the information is supplied to us by third parties and we are not able to check the accuracy or completeness of that information. We do not accept any liability arising from any inaccuracy or omission in any of the information on our App or any liability in respect of information on the App supplied by you, any other App user or any other person.
Your Use of this App
You may only use the App for lawful purposes when seeking employment or help with your career. You must not under any circumstances seek to undermine the security of the App or any information submitted to or available through it. In particular, but without limitation, you must not seek to access, alter or delete any information to which you do not have authorised access, seek to overload the system via spamming or flooding, take any action or use any device, routine or software to crash, delay, damage or otherwise interfere with the operation of the App or attempt to decipher, disassemble or modify any of the software, coding or information comprised in the App.
You are solely responsible for any information submitted by you to the App. You are responsible for ensuring that all information supplied by you is true, accurate, up-to-date and not misleading or likely to mislead or deceive and that it is not discriminatory, obscene, offensive, defamatory or otherwise illegal, unlawful or in breach of any applicable legislation, regulations, guidelines or codes of practice or the copyright, trademark or other intellectual property rights of any person in any jurisdiction. You are also responsible for ensuring that all information, data and files are free of viruses or other routines or engines that may damage or interfere with any system or data prior to being submitted to the App. We reserve the right to remove any information supplied by you from the App at our sole discretion, at any time and for any reason without being required to give any explanation.
Information Submitted by You
We will and/or the Reed Corporate Family will use information supplied by you to aid the recruitment process and associated administrative functions made through this App. We will process any data which you provide in completing the online registration or application forms and any further forms, assessments or personal details which you complete or provide to us when using the App in accordance with relevant data protection legislation. We explain more about your personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please note that all Third Party recruitment agencies have agreed to our Terms and Conditions and should they be found to be in breach of the Terms and Conditions, they will be prevented from using our services.
Further details of our client terms and conditions
.
Transfer outside the EEA: Personal information comprising your CV may be accessed through the Reed.co.uk database by third parties outside the European Economic Area ("EEA"). This could happen for instance if you apply for a vacancy where the employer is based outside the EEA.
Terms of Business
Recruitment: Each employment assignment or placement arising as a result of an introduction made by Reed will be subject to our standard Terms of Business as they are applicable in the circumstances. All prospective employers and clients for whom we arrange assignments or placements will be provided with a copy of the Terms of Business applicable to them at or following registration. Separate terms and conditions also apply to the use of our Recruiter site.
Content Rights
The rights in material on the App are protected by international copyright, software and trademark laws and you agree to use the App in a way which does not infringe these rights. You may copy material on the App for your own private or domestic purposes, but no copying for any commercial or business use is permitted.
Security and Passwords
In order to register with the App and to sign in when you visit the App you will need to use a username and password. You are solely responsible for the security and proper use of your password, which should be kept confidential at all times and not disclosed to any other person. You must notify us immediately if you believe that your password is known to someone else or if it may be used in an unauthorised way. We accept no liability for any unauthorised or improper use or disclosure of any password.
Termination
We may terminate your registration and/or deny you access to the App or any part of it (including any services, goods or information available on or through the App) at any time in our absolute discretion and without any explanation or notification.
Liability
We accept no liability for any loss (whether direct or indirect, for loss of business, revenue or profits, wasted expenditure, corruption or destruction of data or for any other indirect or consequential loss whatsoever) arising from your use of the App and we hereby exclude any such liability, whether in contract, tort (including for negligence) or otherwise. We hereby exclude all representations, warranties and conditions relating to the App and your use of it to the maximum extent permitted by law.
You agree to indemnify us and keep us indemnified against all costs, expenses, claims, losses, liabilities or proceedings arising from use or misuse by you of the App.
You must notify us immediately if anyone makes or threatens to make any claim against you relating to your use of the App.
Choice of Law and Jurisdiction
The use of the App and any agreements entered into through the App are to be governed by and construed in accordance with English law. The courts of England are to have exclusive jurisdiction to settle any dispute arising out of or in connection with the use of the App or any agreement made through the App.
Some of the goods or services offered through the App may not be lawful or may otherwise not be permitted in certain countries outside the United Kingdom. If you attempt to order, receive, purchase or otherwise benefit from any such goods or services, we do not accept any liability for any losses suffered by you in using the App which you would not have suffered had you been accessing the App as a United Kingdom resident (including as a result of us being prevented from dealing with any application or enquiry by any law, regulation or other ruling applicable in any country).
Modern Slavery Act statement
We are committed to ensuring that there is no modern slavery or human trafficking in our supply chains or in any part of our business. For our full Modern Slavery Act statement, please
click here
.
Changes to Terms and Conditions and Invalidity
These terms and conditions may be changed by us at any time. You will be deemed to accept the terms and conditions (as amended) when you next use the App following any amendment.
If any provision of these terms and conditions is held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions, which shall remain in full force and effect.
Registered Office
Reed Online Ltd
Academy Court
94 Chancery Lane
London
WC2A 1DT
Company Number 6317279. Registered in the UK.
Mobile App Privacy policy
The following privacy policy applies if you access our services via the Reed.co.uk Mobile App.
The App is operated by Reed Online Limited. We are part of the Reed Corporate Family.
This privacy policy explains how we use the personal information we collect about you when you use the App.
What we do
Registration with and use of the App for job seekers is free. When you register as a job seeker, you engage with us to provide you with online recruitment services. The service includes providing you with regular bespoke updates of relevant vacancies which may be of interest to you. These updates will be provided as job alerts which we will email to you (or send by SMS messaging where relevant). Job alerts may provide details of vacancies of third-parties and when you express an interest in any of these third-party job alerts by clicking on the relevant link in the emails, you may be taken directly to the website of the third-party provider without the need to log into your Reed account first.
If you do not want to receive that information from us, we give you the opportunity to opt out both as part of the registration process and at any time by updating your contact preferences in your account or by clicking on the "unsubscribe" link within those emails.
Lawful basis for processing of your personal data
Legitimate Interest:
We process your personal data when it is in our legitimate interests to do this in order to provide our services. Our legitimate interests include (but are not limited to) the following: introducing of job seekers and those interested in courses to recruiters and course providers; transmission of job alerts and course alerts; the measures we take in order to ensure the security and integrity of the services we provide; promoting, marketing and advertising of our products and services; analysis of our users' behaviour, activities, preferences and requirements; understanding of existing products and services and the development of new products and services; the handling of customer contacts, queries and complaints; making available the services through the App to our users; the sharing of personal data with our third party suppliers (e.g. communication providers) who act as our data processors to enable us to provide our services; the provision of your contact details, name, IP Address, country of residence and payment confirmation (if relevant) to any course providers where you purchase a course through the Website. Where you only make an inquiry into a course available through the Website, we will only process your personal data as required on the inquiry form.
Consent:
On some occasions, we may process your personal data with your consent. When your consent is required, we will clearly indicate this (e.g. when we share your CV with external CV review partners). You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. When you do so, we will cease to process such data.
The processing is required under legal obligation:
We may process your personal data to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation e.g. detecting, preventing or investigating crime or fraud including working with law enforcement agencies.
What Information do we collect about you?
The personal information we collect about you may include the following:
The information set out in your CV,
Information to enable us to provide our services e.g. your date of birth and location, your preferred job location and the kind of work you are interested in,
General identification and contact information e.g. your name, IP address, residential address, email and telephone details,
Marketing preferences,
Statistical information e.g. aggregate statistical information about site visits,
We collect the personal data about you when you register with us. We do so in order to provide you with the recruitment services as well as for administrative purposes when you purchase or enquire about courses available through the Website. We also collect your personal data on behalf of our sister company, Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited who provides services similar to ours. Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited will process your personal data in accordance with their own Privacy Notice which can be found
here
.
If you decide to upload a CV, cover letter, personal statement or other similar document or information we will keep that information for as long as you want to keep your account with us.
If you decide to purchase any courses through the Website you will be directed to either the Course Provider directly, or to a third-party payment provider (e.g Sagepay, Paypal, Dividebuy) to complete payment.
If you choose to take any assessments available through the Website, we will also maintain a record of your responses to and results of those assessments.
If you register for career advice, we only require your name and email address.
What do we do with your personal data?
Job Seekers:
By registering with the Website, it is understood that job seekers are actively soliciting contact from prospective employers and recruiters about opportunities which match the job seekers' fields of interest as well as relevant courses which may improve a job seeker's career prospects. If you are a job seeker, we will therefore make your personal data available to recruiters and employers who use our services to find suitable employees for specific roles that they are seeking to fill.
Although the primary purpose of the Website is to allow job seekers, prospective employers and recruiters to find each other, job seekers have the ability to control the extent to which your personal data is shared with other recruiters and prospective employers through the contact preferences section of the "your account" section on the App.
For job seekers, we will use your personal data to supply you with the recruitment services that we provide including job alerts, to manage your account and to provide you with information about our recruitment services
Course Seekers:
If you register with the Website because you have an interest in the courses advertised through it, your details will be used to provide you with course alerts, to manage your account, to put you in touch with the relevant third party course providers and facilitate payment for the course (where relevant), to provide the course to you if the course is provided by us, to provide you with courses information that is relevant to your field of interest and to contact you to provide feedback on our services.
If you do want to receive that information from us, we give you the opportunity to opt out both as part of the registration process and at any time by updating your contact preferences in your account or by clicking on the "unsubscribe" link within those emails.
Marketing
From time to time, we would like to tell you more about our other goods and services. We will do this by sending you marketing emails if you subscribe to them when you sign up to use our services (by ticking the relevant box where indicated). You can subsequently unsubscribe by clicking the unsubscribe link in every subsequent marketing email.
You can also amend the contact preferences in your account at any time to stop us from contacting you in connection with the recruitment services or courses available through the App and our Website, including job alerts for which you register when you set up your account as well as course alerts you may elect to receive upon registration.
Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited may also send you marketing information relating to the services it provides and which may be of interest to you. You have the right to opt out of receiving such marketing information at any time.
We use tracking pixels in our marketing emails. These pixels provide us with information in relation to your interaction with the emails (e.g. if you opened the email). This information helps us to better understand how customers engage with our content and to analyse the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns. You can disable tracking pixels by changing your email settings to block the loading or display of external images.
Data Sharing and Transfers
Job seekers:
As part of the recruitment services we provide to help you find a suitable job, we may make your personal data available to third parties such as recruiters, direct employers and their agents or other business partners. We attempt to verify the identity of these third parties when they sign up with us, however we do not make any warranties as to their authenticity. This would normally happen when you apply for a job through the Website or when a recruiter downloads your CV as part of the services they purchase from us. These parties will also be data controllers of your personal data. The amount of personal data we share with these parties depends on the options you select when you create or update your account. We will also share your personal data with our sister company, Reed Specialist Recruitment Limited, for the reasons set out in this privacy notice.
Courses:
When you purchase or enquire about a course available through the Website, we will make your personal data available to the course provider to enable it to provide the course to you. The course provider will be a data controller in relation to your personal data.
All users:
We may share your personal data with third party service providers who assist us in carrying out our business activities. These third parties act as our data processors and are bound by strict contractual provisions to only process your personal data under our instructions and for the limited purposes we permit them. These third parties include (but are not limited to) our accountants; auditors; external legal advisors; external IT providers; support and hosting service providers; printing, advertising, marketing and market research and analysis service providers, technical engineers, data storage and cloud providers and all other outsourced service providers (such as communication providers) that assist us in the provision of our services.
We may also share your personal data with courts, tribunals, regulators and other governmental and public authorities (such as the police or tax authorities) to: (i) allow us to pursue legal remedies, (ii) to enforce our terms and conditions and protect our operations, (iii) to comply with legal process, (iv) to comply with applicable law, and (v) to respond to requests from public and governmental bodies.
Your personal data is stored on our servers which are in the European Economic Area. Your personal data may be processed outside the EEA where you apply for a job advertised by a recruiter outside the EEA, where such a recruiter downloads your CV, or where you purchase a course from a course provider outside the EEA. In such situations, we enter into legally binding contracts with such recruiters and course providers to aim to ensure that your personal data is protected.
Access to your information and correction
We want to make sure that your information is accurate and up-to-date and will delete or amend any information that you think is inaccurate. Should you wish to delete your account please
contact us via the online form
. Amendments to your account can be made online by
signing in to your account
or by
contacting us
.
We aim to provide you with useful work-related services for the whole of your career. However, you have the right to close your account at any time and have us delete all of your personal information unless we are in the process of responding to any complaint that you make.
Strictly necessary technology
These technologies help our website and App run smoothly and are strictly necessary to provide certain essential features, such as being able to submit forms. You can set your device to block or alert you about these technologies, but some parts of the app will not then work. They aren't used to store any personal information.
Functional technology
These technologies help us provide more personalised service. They're based on previous choices a user has made, which help improve their experience on the app. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our app. If you do not allow these SDKs then some or all of these services may not function properly (e.g. remembering preferred language options, push notifications, in-app messages).
Performance & analytical technology
These technologies provide anonymous information on pages visited. They also allow us to analyse user behaviour, enabling us to improve app performance and provide the right amount of support when required.
Advertising technology
These technologies use your data to allow us to analyse how you installed our app to better support your experience.
Third-party service providers
We will use the services of third parties to compile reports and to help improve the App;
Firebase Analytics
We use these services to collects usage and behaviour data on your device called log data, that this may include the device IP address, device name, operating system version, the configuration of the Software, the time and date of any use of the Software, the screens you visit and other statistics;
We also use these services to monitor the performance of the App to help track, prioritise, and fix stability issues.
The information is collected in a way that does not directly identify you;
Google's overview of privacy and safeguarding data is available here
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Google Analytics
Google Tag Manager
Appsflyer
Appsflyer is a partner we use to help us measure the effectiveness of our campaigns to promote the App.
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/
Braze
We use Braze to send communications to you and measure their effectiveness.
https://www.braze.com/privacy
Other websites
This App contains links to other websites and apps. This privacy policy only applies to this App, so when you link to other websites you should review their own privacy policies.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
We keep our privacy policy under regular review and we place any updates on this web page. This policy was last updated on 16 June 2021.
How to contact us
Please contact us if you have any questions about our privacy policy or information we hold about you:
by email
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
or write to us at Data Protection Officer, Reed Online Limited, Academy Court, 94 Chancery Lane, London, WC2A 1DT.
How do you remove your name from the database?
You can
contact us
to request for your account to be closed at any time, which will be confirmed by Reed.
How do you unsubscribe from future mailings?
If you have a reed.co.uk jobseeker account, you can stop receiving emails by
updating your contact preferences
.
If you have a Reed.co.uk jobseeker account, you can stop receiving marketing emails by
updating your contact preferences
.
If you have a Reed.co.uk jobseeker account, you can stop receiving emails by
updating your contact preferences
.
How can you obtain information held about you?
You have the right to request a copy of the information that we hold about you. If you would like a copy of some or all of your personal information please email us at
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
.
Complaints
If you would like to make a complaint about how your information is being used by us, or how your complaint has been handled, you have the right to lodge a complaint directly with the Information Commissioner's Office or our Data Protection Officer. You can write to us at
dpo@reedonline.co.uk
, or to the Information Commissioner's Office at: Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF (or by email to
casework@ico.org.uk
).
Registered Office
Reed Online Ltd
Academy Court
94 Chancery Lane
London
WC2A 1DT
Company Number 6317279. Registered in the UK.
Your security on reed.co.uk
At reed.co.uk, we're committed to helping you find the right job in a safe and secure environment.
Your security on reed.co.uk
Your security on Reed.co.uk
At Reed.co.uk, we're committed to helping you find the right job in a safe and secure environment.
On our website, www.Reed.co.uk, you can learn more about some of the most common internet security threats, what you can do to protect yourself, and what we do to ensure your details remain secure.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
http://tinymcesupport.com/privacy:
Skip to content
rssfeeds = v9bet v9bet đăng nhập v9bet link link vào v9bet nhà cái v9bet v9bet điện thoại v9bet
                v9bett v9bet 189.229 v9bet v9beting link v9bet đăng ký v9bet cập nhật v9bet v9bet go v9bet net v9bet tel
                v9bet 229 v9bet vin v9bet studio v9bet vxbt www v9bet com v9bet la v9bet win v9bet the thao đăng nhập
                v9bet tại v9bet link vao v9bet v9bet trang chủ v9bet v9bet v9bet ac v9bet com
V9BET đang bị chặn tại VN? Đây Là Link V9 BET Backup
LINK THAY THẾ V9BET
Khám phá thêm nhà uy tín khác của chúng tôi
Nội Dung Bài Viết
Tổng hợp thông tin chi tiết về nhà cái V9BET
Phân tích những ưu điểm của nhà cái V9BET
Điểm danh top trò chơi hot nhất tại V9BET
Hướng dẫn đăng ký V9BET
Hướng dẫn đăng nhập V9BET
Quy trình nạp tiền V9BET
Hướng dẫn rút tiền v9bet88
Khuyến mãi V9BET hấp dẫn cùng nhiều sự kiện lớn
Kết luận
V9BET
đang là tâm điểm của sự chú ý trên các diễn đàn về game trực tuyến. Thương hiệu nổi tiếng với loạt siêu phẩm giải trí kèm theo tỷ lệ trả thưởng cực kỳ hấp dẫn.
Với chất lượng dịch vụ tuyệt vời, nơi đây đã nhanh chóng chiếm lấy một phần quan trọng trên thị trường. Ngay bây giờ, cùng bài viết sau khám phá về tụ điểm giải trí này nhé!
Tổng hợp thông tin chi tiết về nhà cái V9BET
V9BET tự hào trở thành điểm đến được nhiều tay cược tin cậy. Nơi đây đang sở hữu một lượng hội viên đông đảo và chưa có dấu hiệu giảm.
Thương hiệu chính thức gia nhập thị trường vào 2012 và thành lập bởi công ty Pinnacle Solution N.V. Ngay từ ngày đầu, sân chơi đã có giấy phép từ tổ chức CEZA và FCLRC.
Nền tảng có trụ sở chính đặt tại Philippines nên mọi hoạt động đều do quốc gia này quản lý. Như vậy, mọi người hoàn toàn có thể yên tâm về quyền lợi của mình khi ghé thăm nơi đây.
Hiện nay, nhà cái đang hoạt động chủ yếu tại khu vực Châu Á trong đó có Việt Nam với sự hưởng ứng nhiệt tình. Sân chơi đang hướng tới mục tiêu toàn cầu hóa thương hiệu quả mình.
Giới thiệu về V9BET
Phân tích những ưu điểm của nhà cái V9BET
Mặc dù số lượng nhà cái cung cấp dịch vụ giải trí ngày càng tăng nhưng V9BET vẫn luôn là sự lựa chọn ưu tiên của nhiều người.
Nơi đây tự hào trở thành một sân chơi được giới bet thủ yêu thích nhờ đầu tư vào chất lượng dịch vụ. Điều này thể hiện rõ thông qua những ưu điểm nổi bật sau:
V9BET ấn tượng với thiết kế giao diện trực quan, hiện đại
Sân chơi khiến nhiều người phải trầm trồ ngay từ cái nhìn đầu tiên. Giao diện sang trọng, thiết kế tinh tế tạo nên một không gian trải nghiệm đẳng cấp.
Hình ảnh 3D, rõ nét cùng âm thanh sống động mê hoặc rất nhiều bet thủ. Màu sắc dịu nhẹ được kết hợp hài hoà không gây hại cho mắt khi nhìn quá lâu.
Sự chuyên nghiệp của nền tảng còn thể hiện rõ ở cách bố trí giao diện. Bố cục sắp xếp khoa học, logic giúp người dùng dễ dàng thao tác dù mới ghé thăm lần đầu.
Sân chơi uy tín, V9BET cam kết an toàn
Nhà cái luôn ưu tiên sự an toàn của người luôn lên hàng đầu. Nơi đây ứng dụng công nghệ hiện đại vào hệ thống bảo mật để bảo vệ dữ liệu riêng tư.
Toàn bộ thông tin cá nhân của hội viên sẽ được quản lý bởi cơ chế mã hóa hai chiều cùng lớp tường lửa nghiêm ngặt.
Nhờ vậy mà mọi sự xâm nhập trái phép từ bên ngoài đều được ngăn chặn. Đồng thời, sân chơi cũng không để xảy ra hiện tượng bị rò rỉ thông tin cho bên thứ 3.
Đánh giá các ưu điểm khi chơi game V9BET
Dịch vụ CSKH tại V9 BET siêu chất
V9BET nhận được rất nhiều phản hồi tốt từ dịch vụ CSKH. Sân chơi sở hữu đội ngũ nhân viên chất lượng, làm việc xuyên suốt 24/7 mỗi ngày.
Hoi sẵn sàng xuất hiện mỗi khi người chơi cần sự hỗ trợ đảm bảo không làm gián đoạn cuộc vui của các bet thủ.
Đồng thời, sự tận tình, chu đáo của đội ngũ chăm sóc khách hàng chinh phục được cả những tay chơi khó tinh nhất.
Hệ thống NẠP RÚT TIỀN V9BET hiện đại
Thương hiệu xây dựng một hệ thống thanh toán siêu tiện lợi với nhiều kênh giao dịch. Bạn có thể dễ dàng nạp/ rút tiền bằng 1 trong các cách như: Ví điện tử, thẻ cào, thẻ ngân hàng,…
Quy trình hết sức đơn giản, người dùng dễ dàng thực hiện chỉ với vài thao tác. Như vậy bạn chỉ mất vài phút để hoàn thành một giao dịch.
V9 BET cung cấp tỉ lệ ăn thưởng hấp dẫn
Ưu điểm lớn nhất của V9BET đó chính là mang đến tỷ lệ trả thưởng cao hơn hẳn so với những đơn vị khác.
Khi trải nghiệm tại đây, bạn có thể nhanh chóng nhận về số tiền thưởng kếch xù chủ với một mức vốn ít ỏi.
Trên thực tế đã có không ít tay chơi đổi đời thành công sau vài ván cược. Vậy nên nơi đây trở thành sự lựa chọn lý tưởng được nhiều bet thủ gửi gắm để thử vận may.
Điểm danh top trò chơi hot nhất tại V9BET
Sự đa dạng về sản phẩm giải trí đã góp phần tạo nên chỗ đứng vững chắc cho V9BET trên thị trường đổi thưởng như ngày hôm nay.
Cùng điểm qua một số chuyên mục hot nhất của sân chơi này ngay sau đây nhé!
Sảnh cá cược thể thao V9BET
Sảnh cược được nền tảng đầu tư rất mạnh tay với nhiều môn chơi thể thao thoả mãn đam mê của nhiều bet thủ. Tại đây có bóng đá, bóng rổ, quần vợt, đua ngựa,….
Mỗi bộ môn đều mang đến loạt sự lựa chọn hấp dẫn với nhiều sự kiện có sức ảnh hưởng toàn cầu. Điển hình như WC, C1, Euro cùng nhiều giải đấu khác.
Hơn nữa, sân chơi cung cấp hệ thống kèo cược rất hấp dẫn. Bạn được tham gia cá cược cùng kèo Châu Á, Tài Xỉu, Châu Âu kèm theo loạt kèo phụ đặc sắc.
Sảnh Casino trực tuyến V9 BET
Casino trực tuyến chính là sân chơi hot nhất tại V9BET. Nơi đây luôn trong tình trạng tấp nập người ghé thăm bởi sự đa dạng về hình thức giải trí.
Bet thủ có thể thỏa thích lựa chọn cùng vô vàn siêu phẩm hot như:
Poker
Roulette
Baccarat
Phỏm
Mậu Binh
Tài Xỉu,….
Đồng thời, nhà cái còn kết hợp với nhiều đơn vị phát hàng để mang đến những sảnh cược Casino chất lượng nhất.
Top các sảnh game cá cược đình đám chỉ có tại V9BET
Sảnh Slots Game quay thưởng
Sảnh cược mở ra một thiên đường giải trí đúng nghĩa với nhiều sự lựa chọn siêu hấp dẫn.
Sự phong phú về trò chơi kết hợp với cốt truyện độc đáo khiến bet thủ đứng ngồi không yên.
Ghé thăm nơi đây, bạn có thể giải trí cùng những cái tên đình đám như Thần Tài, Tây Du Ký, Ăn Khế Trả Vàng,…
Tất cả đều sở hữu luật chơi vô cùng đơn giản phù hợp với mọi đối tượng.
Không chỉ dễ chơi, game Slot còn gây ấn tượng bởi giá trị jackpot siêu hấp dẫn. Mọi người dễ dàng bỏ túi tiền tỷ chỉ sau một lần quay thưởng.
Sảnh xổ số V9BET
Sân chơi ăn khách nhất của nhà cái V9BET thu hút hàng trăm nghìn lượt ghé thăm mỗi ngày.
Tại đây, bet thủ có cơ hội được làm giàu cùng nhiều hình thức Xổ số như 3 miền, siêu tốc,…
Sảnh cược mang đến cho mọi người những giải thưởng với giá trị siêu khủng.
Bạn chỉ tham gia dự thưởng cùng 1 chiếc vé 10k đã có thể mang về hàng tỷ đồng nếu may mắn.
Hướng dẫn đăng ký V9BET
V9BET sở hữu không gian giải trí siêu chất kích thích tính tò mò từ không ít bet thủ. Vậy làm thế nào để trải nghiệm cùng sân chơi này?
Hãy bỏ túi hướng dẫn chi tiết về các thao tác trải nghiệm cùng dân chơi này cùng nội dung dưới đây nhé!
Quy trình đăng ký V9BET siêu nhanh
Để trở thành thành viên của nhà cái rất đơn giản, bạn chỉ cần thực hiện đúng theo quy trình các bước dưới đây:
Bước 1: Truy cập trang chủ sân chơi bằng link chính thống. Ở bước này bạn nên cẩn thận trước những liên kết giả mạo từ các đối tượng lừa đảo.
Bước 2: Nhấn “Đăng ký” và hoàn thành biểu mẫu do hệ thống yêu cầu. Những nội dung bet thủ phải cung cấp bao gồm:
Tên đăng nhập:
Sử dụng dữ liệu bất kỳ với 6 ký tự trở lên.
Mật khẩu:
Thiết lập password có đủ chữ, số, ký tự đặc biệt đảm bảo trên 8 ký tự.
Nhập lại MK:
Điền lại thông tin về mật khẩu đã nhập ở trên.
Email:
Cung cấp thông tin email mà mình đang dùng.
SDT:
Nhập dữ liệu về SĐT có thêm +84 ở trước.
Bước 3: Kiểm tra cẩn thận thông tin đã cung cấp và tích vào ô trống “Đồng ý với điều khoản”.
Nhấn gửi “Đăng nhập” và chờ đợi thông báo thành công từ hệ thống.
Chi tiết về các bước đăng ký tài khoản V9BET
Hướng dẫn đăng nhập V9BET
Sau khi tạo tài khoản thành công, bạn có thể nhanh chóng đăng nhập để bắt đầu trải nghiệm các sản phẩm giải trí của nền tảng. Quy trình chi tiết bao gồm các thao tác cơ bản sau đây:
Bước 1:
Truy cập giao diện chính của nhà cái và nhấn “Đăng nhập”.
Bước 2:
Biểu mẫu hiển ra, bạn điền thông tin về “Tên đăng nhập”, “Mật khẩu” và “Mã xác nhận”.
Bước 3:
Check dữ liệu đã điền một cách cẩn thận và chọn “Đăng nhập” để tham gia giải trí cùng hệ thống.
Hướng dẫn đăng nhập tài khoản link V9bet từ A đến Z
Quy trình nạp tiền V9BET
Sân chơi đổi thưởng ăn tiền thật nên bắt buộc hội viên phải nạp tiền vào tài khoản mới được phép tham gia đổi thưởng. Giao dịch an toàn, đơn giản chỉ gói gọn trong 3 bước sau đây:
Bước 1:
Mở trang chủ và bấm vào mục “Nạp tiền” ngay trên màn hình chính.
Bước 2:
Click vào kênh giao dịch phù hợp với điều kiện của mình. Tiếp theo, hoàn tất biểu mẫu bằng cách nhập thông tin liên quan đến phương thức đã chọn trước đó. Cụ thể:
Thẻ ngân hàng: Tên ngân hàng, STK, số tiền cần nạp.
Thẻ cào: Nhà mạng, mệnh giá, số seri, số thẻ.
Ví điện tử: Tên ví, địa chỉ, số tiền nạp.
Bước 3:
Kết thúc giao dịch bằng cách kiểm tra kỹ thông tin và nhấn “Gửi”. Sau khoảng 5 – 10 phút số tiền đó sẽ được cộng ngay vào ví của bạn.
Hướng dẫn các bước nạp tiền siêu nhanh tại v9betz
Hướng dẫn rút tiền v9bet88
Sân chơi hỗ trợ hội viên rút tiền siêu nhanh, an toàn, đơn giản với các thao tác rất dễ. Để thực hiện suôn sẻ, bạn hãy tham khảo hướng dẫn chi tiết sau đây:
Bước 1:
Truy cập quyền thành viên và nhấn “Rút tiền”.
Bước 2:
Chọn phương thức thanh toán sao cho tiện lợi với mình nhất. Sau đó, hoàn thành biểu mẫu do hệ thống yêu cầu.
Tại đây bạn hãy điền chính xác thông tin tương ứng với kênh giao dịch đã chọn. Cụ thể:
TK ngân hàng: Số tài khoản, chi nhánh, số tiền muốn rút.
Thẻ cào: Nhà mạng, mệnh giá.
Ví điện tử: Tên ví, địa chỉ ví, số tiền.
Bước 3:
Xác nhận lại các dữ liệu cung cấp hoàn toàn chính xác và gửi “Rút tiền”.
Sau đó, hệ thống sẽ xử lý giao dịch trong khoảng vài phút và bạn chỉ cần chờ đợi để nhận thưởng.
Chi tiết về các bước rút tiền đơn giản, an toàn
Khuyến mãi V9BET hấp dẫn cùng nhiều sự kiện lớn
Triển khai hàng loạt sự kiện khuyến mãi khủng chính là một trong những cách thức marketing hiệu quả của
v9bet link
.
Nơi đây thu hút được không ít bet thủ các chương trình khuyến mãi siêu đỉnh. Cùng tổng hợp những ưu đãi hot hit nhất từ sân chơi ngay sau đây nhé!
Chương trình khuyến mãi chào mừng
V9 BET
Khuyến mãi chào tân binh đã thu hút được sự chú ý từ giới bet thủ. Ngay sau khi tạo tài khoản xác nhận đăng ký thành công bạn sẽ nhận được một khoản vốn khởi nghiệp.
Như vậy bet thủ có cơ hội bỏ túi ngay 100k để thỏa thích trải nghiệm cùng các sản phẩm dịch vụ của nhà cái mà không cần phải bỏ tiền túi.
Hoàn trả tiền cược khi chơi V9BET
Ưu đãi dành cho toàn thể các hội viên của sân chơi. Tỷ lệ hoàn trả lên đến 0.58% tùy vào từng sảnh cược có hiệu quả rất tốt trong việc khích lệ tinh thần người chơi. Cụ thể:
Hoàn trả Thể Thao không giới hạn với tỷ suất 0.38%.
Hoàn trả Casino mỗi ngày lên đến 0.58%.
Thưởng nạp tiền V9 BET
Khuyến mãi nạp tiền tại
nhà cái V9BET
mang đến nhiều phần quà vô cùng hấp dẫn. Bạn đừng bỏ lỡ những chương trình ưu đãi như:
Tặng 100% cho lần nạp thẻ đầu tiên.
Tặng thêm 50% cho lần giao dịch thứ 2 với số tiền không giới hạn.
Tổng hợp ưu đãi hấp dẫn không thể bỏ qua tại v9bett.net
Khuyến mãi thường nhật
Đơn vị còn triển khai một loạt sự kiện tặng quà mỗi ngày.
Người chơi sẽ được nhận thưởng từ các ưu đãi như quay thưởng miễn phí, giảm giá cược hoặc tặng giftcode may mắn,….
Chương trình tri ân hội viên lâu năm
Bên cạnh những khuyến mãi khủng ở trên, nhà cái còn dành riêng chương trình ưu đãi độc quyền để tri ân những khách hàng lâu năm, VIP.
Các bet thủ có thể tham gia nhiều sự kiện như tặng thưởng nạp tiền, quà mừng sinh nhật, hoàn trả hấp dẫn,….
Kết luận
Tóm lại,
V9BET
là sân chơi lý tưởng dành cho tín đồ đam mê trò chơi cá cược. Nơi đây hứa hẹn mang đến giây phút trải nghiệm tuyệt vời cùng nhiều trò chơi hấp dẫn.
Hy vọng các bet thủ sẽ có những giây phút trải nghiệm đáng nhớ cùng nền tảng. Đừng quên cập nhật trang web thường xuyên để không bỏ lỡ bất kỳ sự kiện hot hit nào nhé!
Sub-policy 1
http://twitter.com/privacy:
Skip to main content
Privacy Policy
Privacy Settings
Privacy Center
Help Center
Policy Archive
Download PDF
X Privacy Policy
Effective: November 15, 2024
Before you scroll, read this
It’s really hard to make everyone happy with a Privacy Policy. Most people who use X want something short and easy to understand. While we wish we could fit everything you need to know into a post, our regulators ask us to meet our legal obligations by describing them all in a lot of detail.
With that in mind, we’ve written our Privacy Policy as simply as possible to empower you to make informed decisions when you use X by making sure you understand and have control over the information we collect, how it’s used, and when it’s shared.
So if you skip reading every word of the Privacy Policy, at least know this:
X is a public platform
Learn what’s viewable & searchable
We collect some data
about you
Learn what we collect & how
Affiliate services may have their own policies
Learn about affiliates
We use your data to make X better
Learn how we make your info work
You can control your experience
Learn how to update your settings
If you have questions about how we use data, just ask
Learn how to contact us
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
1. Information We Collect
The information we collect when you use X falls into three categories.
1.1 Information you provide us.
To use some of our products and services you need to have an account, and to create an account, you need to provide us certain information. Likewise, if you use our paid products and services, we cannot provide them to you without getting payment information. Basically, certain information is necessary if you want to use many of our products and services.
Personal Accounts.
If you create an account, you must provide us with some information so that we can provide our services to you. This includes a display name (for example, “Creators”); a username (for example, @XCreators); a password; an email address or phone number; a date of birth; your display language; and third-party single sign-in information (if you choose this sign-in method). You can also choose to share your location in your profile and posts, and to upload your address book to X to help find people you may know. Your profile information, which includes your display name and username, is always public, but you can use either your real name or a pseudonym. And remember, you can create multiple X accounts, for example, to express different parts of your identity, professional or otherwise.
Professional Accounts.
If you create a
professional account
, you also need to provide us with a professional category, and may provide us with other information, including street address, contact email address, and contact phone number, all of which will always be public.
Payment Information.
In order to purchase ads or other offerings provided as part of our paid products and services you will need to provide us payment information, including your credit or debit card number, card expiration date, CVV code, and billing address.
Preferences.
When you set your preferences using your
settings
, we collect that information so that we can respect your preferences.
Biometric Information.
Based on your consent, we may collect and use your biometric information for safety, security, and identification purposes.
Job Applications / Recommendations.
We may collect and use your personal information (such as your biographical information, employment history, educational history, employment preferences, skills and abilities, and job search activity and engagement, in addition to the information we already collect as disclosed in the “Information we collect when you use X” section of our Privacy Policy below) to recommend potential jobs to you, to share with potential employers when you apply for a job, to enable connections for professional opportunities, and to show you more relevant advertising.
1.2 Information we collect when you use X.
When you use our services, we collect information about how you use our products and services. We use that information to provide you with products and services, to help keep X more secure and respectful for everyone, and more relevant to you.
Usage Information.
We collect information about your activity on X, including:
Posts and other content you post (including the date, application, and version of X) and information about your broadcast activity (e.g., Spaces), including broadcasts you’ve created and when you created them, your lists, bookmarks, and Communities you are a part of.
Your interactions with other users’ content, such as reposts, likes, bookmarks, shares, downloads, replies, if other users mention or tag you in content or if you mention or tag them, and broadcasts you’ve participated in (including your viewing history, listening, commenting, speaking, and reacting).
How you interact with others on the platform, such as people you follow and people who follow you, metadata related to
Encrypted Messages
, and when you use
Direct Messages
, including the contents of the messages, the recipients, and date and time of messages.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will collect information about the communication and its content.
We collect information on links you interact with across our services (including in our emails sent to you).
Purchase and payments.
To allow you to make a payment or send money using X features or services, including through an intermediary, we may receive information about your transaction such as when it was made, when a subscription is set to expire or auto-renew, and amounts paid or received.
Device Information.
We collect information from and about the devices you use to access X, including:
Information about your connection, such as your IP address, browser type, and related information.
Information about your device and its settings, such as device and advertising ID, operating system, carrier, language, memory, apps installed, and battery level.
Your device address book, if you’ve chosen to share it with us.
Location Information.
When you use X, we collect some information about your approximate location to provide the service you expect, including showing you relevant ads. You can also choose to share your current precise location or places where you’ve previously used X by enabling these settings in your account.
Inferred Identity.
We may collect or receive information that we use to infer your identity as detailed below:
When you sign into X on a browser or device, we will associate that browser or device with your account. Subject to your settings, we may also associate your account with browsers or devices other than those you use to sign into X (or associate your signed-out device or browser with other browsers or devices or X-generated identiﬁers).
When you provide other information to X, including an email address or phone number, we associate that information with your X account. Subject to your settings, we may also use this information in order to infer other information about your identity, for example by associating your account with hashes of email addresses that share common components with the email address you have provided to X.
When you access X and are not signed in, we may infer your identity based on the information we collect.
Log Information.
We may receive information when you view content on or otherwise interact with our products and services, even if you have not created an account or are signed out, such as:
IP address and related information; browser type and language; operating system; the referring webpage; access times; pages visited; location; your mobile carrier; device information (including device and application IDs); search terms and IDs (including those not submitted as queries); ads shown to you on X; X-generated identiﬁers; and identiﬁers associated with cookies. We also receive log information when you click on, view, or interact with links on our services, including when you install another application through X.
Advertisements.
When you view or interact with ads we serve on or oﬀ X, we may collect information about those views or interactions (e.g., watching a video ad or preroll, clicking on an ad, interacting with reposts of or replies to an ad).
Cookies and similar technologies.
Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our services. Cookies are not required for many parts of our products and services such as searching and looking at public proﬁles. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
Interactions with our content on third-party sites.
When you view our content on third-party websites that integrate X content, such as embedded timelines or post buttons, we may receive log information that includes the web page you visited.
1.3 Information we receive from third parties.
When you use other online products and services, they may share information about that usage with us.
Ad Partners, Developers, Publishers.
Our ad and business partners share information with us such as browser cookie IDs, X-generated identifiers,
mobile device IDs, hashed user information like email addresses, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on a website or app. Some of our ad partners, particularly our advertisers, also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives,
generates, or infers
about you described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy.
Other Third Parties, Account Connections, and Integrations.
We may receive information about you from third parties who are not our ad partners, such as other X users, developers, and partners who help us evaluate the safety and quality of content on our platform, our
corporate affiliates
, and other services you link to your X account. You may choose to connect your X account to your account on another service, and that other service may send us information about your account on that service.
2. How We Use Information
Breaking down how we use the information we collect is not simple because of the way the systems that bring our services to you work. For example, the same piece of information may be used differently for different purposes to ultimately deliver a single service. We think it’s most useful to describe the five main ways we use information and if you have questions that are not answered, you can always
contact us
. Here we go:
2.1 Operate, improve, and personalize our services.
We use the information we collect to provide and operate X products and services. We also use the information we collect to improve and personalize our products and services so that you have a better experience on X, including by showing you more relevant content and ads, suggesting people and topics to follow, enabling and helping you discover
affiliates
, third-party apps, and services. We may use the information we collect and publicly available information to help train our machine learning or artificial intelligence models for the purposes outlined in this policy.
We may use the information we collect from accounts of other services that you choose to connect to your X account to provide you features like cross-posting or cross-service authentication, and to operate our services.
We use your contact information to help others find your account if your settings permit, including through third-party services and client applications.
We use your information to provide our advertising and sponsored content services subject to your
settings
, which helps make ads on X more relevant to you. We also use this information to measure the effectiveness of ads and to help recognize your devices to serve you ads on and off of X. Some of our ad partners also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives, generates, or infers about you, as described elsewhere in our Privacy Policy.
2.2  Foster safety and security.
We use information we collect to provide for the safety and security of our users, our products, services, and your account. This includes verifying your identity, authenticating your account, and defending against fraud, unauthorized use, and illegal activity. We also use the information to evaluate and affect the safety and quality of content on X - this includes investigating and enforcing our policies and and terms, as well as applicable law.
2.3 Measure, analyze and make our services better.
We use the information we collect to measure and analyze the effectiveness of our products and services and to better understand how you use them in order to make them better.
2.4 Communicate with you about our services.
We use the information we collect to communicate with you about our products and services, including about product updates and changes to our policies and terms. If you’re open to hearing from us, we may also send you marketing messages from time to time.
2.5 Research.
We use information you share with us, or that we collect to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
3. Sharing Information
You should know the ways we share your information, why we share it, and how you can control it. There are five general ways we share your information.
3.1 When you post and share.
With the general public
. You are directing us to disclose that information as broadly as possible. X content, including your profile information (e.g., name/pseudonym, username, profile pictures), is available for viewing by the general public. The public does not need to be signed in to view some content on X. They may also find X content off of X: for example, from search query results on Internet search engines or videos downloaded and reshared elsewhere (depending on your
settings
).
With other X users.
Depending on your
settings
, and based on the X products and services you use, we share:
Your interactions with X content of other users, such as replies, and people you follow.
Content you send to a specific X user, such as through
Direct Messages
. Please keep in mind that if you’ve shared information like Direct Messages or protected posts with someone else who accesses X through a third-party service, the information may be shared with the third-party service.
With partners.
Depending on your
settings
, we also provide certain third parties with information to help us offer or operate our products and services. You can learn more about these partnerships in our
Help Center
. You can control whether X shares your personal information with these partners by using the “Data sharing with business partners” option in your
Privacy & Safety settings
. (This setting does not control sharing described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, such as when we share information with our service providers, or through partnerships other than as described in this
Help Center
article.)
3.2 With third parties & third-party integrations.
With service providers.
We may share your information with our
service providers
that perform functions and provide services on our behalf, including payment services providers who facilitate payments; service providers that host our various blogs and wikis; service providers that help us understand the use of our services; applicant tracking system providers to send and receive applicant and job data to potential employers; and those that provide fraud detection services.
With advertisers.
Advertising revenue enables us to provide our products and services. Advertisers may learn information from your engagement with their ads on or off X. For example, if you click on an external link or ad on our services, that advertiser or website operator might figure out that you came from X, along with other information associated with the ad you clicked, such as characteristics of the audience it was intended to reach and other X-generated identifiers for that ad. They may also collect other personal information from you, such as cookie identifiers, or your IP address.
Third-party content & integrations.
We share or disclose your information with your consent or at your direction, such as when you
authorize a third-party web client or application
to access your account or when you direct us to share your feedback with a business. Similarly, to improve your experience, we work with third-party partners to display their video content on X or to allow cross-platform sharing. When you watch or otherwise interact with content from our video or cross-platform sharing partners, they may receive and process your personal information as described in their privacy policies. For video content, you can adjust your
autoplay settings
if you prefer that content not to play automatically.
Third-party collaborators.
Depending on your
settings
, or if you decide to share your data, we may share or disclose your information with third parties. If you do not opt out, in some instances the recipients of the information may use it for their own independent purposes in addition to those stated in X’s Privacy Policy, including, for example, to train their artificial intelligence models, whether generative or otherwise.
Through our APIs.
We use technology like
APIs
and embeds to make public X information available to websites, apps, and others for their use, for example, displaying posts on a news website or analyzing what people say on X. We generally make this content available in limited quantities for free and charge licensing fees for large-scale access. We have
standard terms
that govern how this information can be used, and a compliance program to enforce these terms. But these individuals and companies are not affiliated with X, and their offerings may not reflect updates you make on X. For more information about how we make public data on X available to the world, visit
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 When required by law, to prevent harm, or in the public interest.
We may preserve, use, share, or disclose your information if we believe that it is reasonably necessary to:
comply with a law, regulation,
legal process, or governmental request
;
protect the safety of any person, protect the safety or integrity of our platform, including to help prevent spam, abuse, or malicious actors on our services;
explain why we have removed content or accounts from our services (e.g., for a violation of
our Rules
);
address fraud, security, or technical issues; or
protect our rights or property, or the rights or property of those who use our services.
We may also use different signals and your data to infer, preserve, use, share, or disclose your age and identity information in order to comply with regulatory requirements as well as for safety, security, fraud, know-your-customer, know-your-business, and identity verification, as the case may be. We may also share or disclose your age and identity information with our partners, service providers, and others for these purposes.
3.4 With our Affiliates.
We may share information amongst our
affiliates
to provide our products and services.
3.5 As a result of a change in ownership.
We may share, sell, or transfer information about you in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, sale of assets, or bankruptcy. This Privacy Policy will apply to your personal information that is shared with (before and after the close of any transaction) or transferred to the new entity.
4. How Long We Keep Information
We keep different types of information for different periods of time, depending on how long we need to retain it in order to provide you with our products and services, to comply with our legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
We keep your profile information, such as your display name, user name, password and email address for the duration of your account. We cannot provide you with our products and services without retaining this information.
We keep your usage information, such as the content you post, your interactions with other users’ content and how you interact with others on the platform for the duration of your account or until such content is removed.
We keep your payment information, including your credit or debit card number and billing address for the duration you use our paid products and services. Records of transactions will be kept for longer, in accordance with applicable law.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will keep information about the communication and its content for up to 18 months, unless it is necessary for us to retain it for a longer period to comply with our legal obligations or to exercise or defend our legal rights.
We generally collect device information, location information, inferred identity information and log information using cookies. We keep cookies and information collected using cookies for up to 13 months. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
We keep information about your views or interactions with ads on or off X, as well as how you interact with our content on third-party sites for up to 90 days.
We keep information shared by ad and business partners for up to 90 days.
Where you violate our Rules and your account is suspended, we may keep the identifiers you used to create the account (such as your email address or phone number) indefinitely to prevent repeat policy offenders from creating new accounts.
We may need to keep certain information longer than our policies specify in order to comply with legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
To comply with a law, regulation, legal process or governmental request.
Including in order to adhere to a legally appropriate preservation request made by law enforcement. You can read more about law enforcement access
here
.
In connection with legal claims, litigation and regulatory matters.
Including where it is reasonably necessary to retain information relating to your account in order to defend X against legal claims.
To maintain the safety and security of our products and services.
Including where it is necessary to store your information longer in order to investigate and fight abuse on our products and services.
Remember public content can exist elsewhere even after it is removed from X. For example, search engines and other third parties may retain copies of your posts longer, based upon their own privacy policies, even after they are deleted or expire on X. You can read more about search visibility
here
.
5. Take Control
5.1 Access, Correction, Portability.
You can access, correct, or modify the information you provided to us by editing your profile and adjusting your account
settings
.
You can learn more about the information we have collected or inferred about you in
Your X Data
and request access to additional information
here
.
You can download a copy of your information, such as your posts, by following the instructions
here
.
To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with a deletion, portability, or other related request. We may, in certain situations, reject your request for access, correction, or portability, for example, we may reject access where you are unable to verify your identity.
5.2 Deleting your Information.
If you follow the instructions
here
, your account will be deactivated and your data will be queued for deletion. When deactivated, your X account, including your display name, username, and public profile, will no longer be viewable on X.com, X for iOS, and X for Android. For up to 30 days after deactivation it is still possible to restore your X account if it was accidentally or wrongfully deactivated.
5.3 Objecting to, Restricting, or Withdrawing your Consent.
You can manage your privacy settings and other account features
here
. If you change your settings it may take some time for your choices to be fully reflected throughout our systems. You may also notice changes in your X experience or limitations in your ability to access certain features depending on the settings you’ve adjusted. You may also manage additional settings when interacting with certain content and features on different parts of the platform, such as whether a
Space
is recorded, or whether
videos you upload
are downloadable by others.
5.4 Authorized Agent Requests.
To submit a request related to access, modification, or deletion of your information, or someone else’s information if you are their authorized agent, you may also contact us as specified in the How To Contact X section of our Privacy Policy below. We may require you to provide additional information for verification.
6. Your Rights and Ours
We provide X to people all over the world and provide many of the same privacy tools and controls to all of our users regardless of where they live. However, your experience may be slightly different than users in other countries to ensure X respects local requirements.
6.1 We have specific legal bases to use your information.
X has carefully considered the legal reasons it is permitted to collect, use, share and otherwise process your information. If you want to dig in to learn more and better understand the nuances, we’d encourage you to check out
this additional information about data processing
. And no, we don’t sell your personal information.
6.2 We move your data to make X work for you.
Just as you use X to seamlessly participate in global conversations with people in countries all over the world, X must move information across borders and to different countries around the world to support the safe and reliable service you depend on. For example, if you live in Europe and are having a conversation with someone in the United States, information has to move between those countries to provide that experience – it’s what you expect from us.
We also use data centers and cloud providers, and engage
our affiliates
and third-party partners and
service providers
located in many parts of the world to help us provide our services. Before we move data between countries we look at the risks that may be presented to the data and rely on
standard contractual clauses
(SCCs), where applicable, to ensure your data rights are protected. To request a copy of the SCCs, please contact us
here
. If data will be shared with a third party, we require them to maintain the same protections over your data that we provide directly.
X is a
participant
in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. X complies with the DPF Principles for all its processing of personal data received from the European Union, Switzerland and the UK, in reliance on the EU-US DPF, Swiss-US DPF and UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, respectively. If you have an inquiry or complaint related to our participation in the DPF, please contact us
here
. As part of our participation in the DPF, if you have a dispute with us about our adherence to the DPF Principles, we will seek to resolve it through our internal complaint resolution process, alternatively through the US-based independent dispute resolution body
JAMS
, and under certain conditions, through the DPF Arbitration Process following the procedures and subject to the conditions described in
Annex 1
to the DPF Principles. DPF participants are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission and other authorized statutory bodies. Under certain circumstances, participants may be liable for the transfer of personal data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to third parties outside the EU, Switzerland and the UK. Learn more about the EU-US DPF, the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF
here
.
7. X's Audience
Our services are not directed to children, and you may not use our services if you are under the age of 13. You must also be old enough to consent to the processing of your personal data in your country (in some countries we may allow your
parent or guardian to do so on your behalf
). We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 13. If you become aware that your child has provided us with personal information without your consent, please contact us
here
. If we become aware that a child under 13 has provided us with personal information, we take steps to remove such information and terminate the child’s account. You can find additional resources for parents and teens
here
.
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs our processing of your personal data and we may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time as needed.
If we do revise this Privacy Policy and make changes that are determined by us to be material, we will provide you notice and an opportunity to review the revised Privacy Policy before you continue to use X.
9. General
The X Privacy Policy is written in English but is made available in multiple languages through translations. X strives to make the translations as accurate as possible to the original English version. However, in case of any discrepancies or inconsistencies, the English language version of the X Privacy Policy shall take precedence. You acknowledge that English shall be the language of reference for interpreting and constructing the terms of the X Privacy Policy.
10. How To Contact X
We want to hear from you if you have thoughts or questions about this Privacy Policy. You can contact us via our
Privacy Policy Inquiries
page or by writing to us at the appropriate address below.
Information about our handling of California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) requests is available
here
. Information about our handling of “Consumer Health Data” and associated requests as defined under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act and other similar state laws is available
here
.
If you live in the United States or any other country outside of the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is X Corp., with an address of:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
If you live in the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is Twitter International Unlimited Company, with an address of:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRELAND
If you live in Switzerland, you can also contact our appointed representative at the following address:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
If you wish to raise a concern about our
data processing practices
, you have the right to do so with your local supervisory authority or Twitter International Unlimited Company’s lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, using the
contact details
listed on their website.
View previous policies
Take control of your privacy
Adjust your settings
Did someone say … cookies?
X and its partners use cookies to provide you with a better, safer and
  faster service and to support our business. Some cookies are necessary to use
  our services, improve our services, and make sure they work properly.
Show more about your choices
.
Accept all cookies
Refuse non-essential cookies
Sub-policy 2
http://www.google.co.uk/intl/en/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 3
http://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024
|
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 4
http://www.doubleclick.com/privacy/dart_adserving.aspx:
marketingplatform.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Meaningful insights.
Smarter marketing.
Better results.
Google Marketing Platform brings together your advertising and analytics to help you make quality customer connections, surface deeper insights, and drive better marketing results.
Talk to Sales
A smarter platform for better results.
clock icon
Deliver faster, smarter marketing.
Built-in intelligence automatically surfaces your most valuable marketing insights so you can act quickly to achieve your goals.
slider-controls icon
Gain more control over your investments.
Easily see what parts of your marketing are working and make informed decisions to improve performance — ensuring that you’re delivering quality experiences.
people icon
Understand your audience on a deeper level.
Easily integrate and access your data to gain a deeper understanding of your customers and identify your most valuable audiences.
bulb icon
Share insights across your team.
Make information and insights accessible to your entire enterprise so teams can work better together.
clock icon
Deliver faster, smarter marketing.
Built-in intelligence automatically surfaces your most valuable marketing insights so you can act quickly to achieve your goals.
slider-controls icon
Gain more control over your investments.
Easily see what parts of your marketing are working and make informed decisions to improve performance — ensuring that you’re delivering quality experiences.
people icon
Understand your audience on a deeper level.
Easily integrate and access your data to gain a deeper understanding of your customers and identify your most valuable audiences.
bulb icon
Share insights across your team.
Make information and insights accessible to your entire enterprise so teams can work better together.
1
The results are incredible, it actually helped us transform our whole vision.
We want to be a global brand. Google Marketing Platform facilitates that growth.
Martijn van der Zee
,
          Chief Digital Officer,
              Rituals
GMP_Logo_display-video-360
Display & Video 360
Reach today’s always-connected audiences wherever they are.
Learn more about Display & Video 360
Analytics 360
Use advanced tools to get a deeper understanding of your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Display & Video 360
Reach today’s always-connected audiences wherever they are.
Search Ads 360
Get real-time data and unified insights for your search campaigns.
Tag Manager 360
Manage all your tags in one place for a smarter, simpler way to oversee your marketing.
Campaign Manager 360
Get a complete view of all your digital media campaigns.
1
Designed to work together.
Google Marketing Platform solutions are built to work together, so you can easily access shared data across products — to deliver better customer experiences.
people icon
Reach the right customers.
Easily connect data from across Google products, including Google Ads — to quickly uncover insights.
Go to Integration Center
bar-graph icon
Tailor your measurement with Ads Data Hub.
Use Ads Data Hub to join event-level campaign data from Google Marketing Platform and Google Ads with data from your own sources, such as a CRM system or marketing database, to run customized analysis that aligns to your specific business objectives while protecting user privacy.
Learn More
bulb icon
Do more with Google Cloud.
You can use Google Marketing Platform together with Google Cloud to unlock advanced marketing use cases like building predictive models to get new insights to improve marketing performance.
Learn more
people icon
Reach the right customers.
Easily connect data from across Google products, including Google Ads — to quickly uncover insights.
bar-graph icon
Tailor your measurement with Ads Data Hub.
Use Ads Data Hub to join event-level campaign data from Google Marketing Platform and Google Ads with data from your own sources, such as a CRM system or marketing database, to run customized analysis that aligns to your specific business objectives while protecting user privacy.
Learn More
bulb icon
Do more with Google Cloud.
You can use Google Marketing Platform together with Google Cloud to unlock advanced marketing use cases like building predictive models to get new insights to improve marketing performance.
Learn more
1
Go to Integration Center
The Future of Analytics.
In new research from Forrester Consulting, commissioned by Google, marketers and digital analytics decision makers identify key challenges and opportunities for the next wave of analytics.
Read more
Guide
The CTV playbook: how the latest technology can amplify your CTV performance
Read more
Guide
The marketer’s playbook for navigating today’s privacy environment
Read more
Report
The Future of Analytics
Read more
1
See all resources
Looking for small-business solutions?
With plenty of free solutions, Google Marketing Platform can help grow businesses of any size.
See solutions
News and insights delivered to your inbox.
Sign up to get the latest Google Marketing Platform news, success stories and insights, delivered right into your inbox.
Subscribe
Sub-policy 5
http://www.specificmedia.co.uk/privacy:

Sub-policy 6
http://www.sizmek.com/en/privacy-policy/:
403 ERROR
The request could not be satisfied.
Bad request.
We can't connect to the server for this app or website at this time. There might be too much traffic or a configuration error. Try again later, or contact the app or website owner.
If you provide content to customers through CloudFront, you can find steps to troubleshoot and help prevent this error by reviewing the CloudFront documentation.
Generated by cloudfront (CloudFront)
Request ID: gYkSjRo_sB2ZLtIOYcrhcrcD73cF_UKUHFmTDVepRezuF9pVZWgpDg==
Sub-policy 7
http://www.theexchangelab.com/privacy-policy:

Sub-policy 8
http://adnetik.com/privacy-policy/:
Share your knowledge | Questions and answers about education - adnetik.com
Explore the world of knowledge with our educational Q&A platform. Chat with experts, ask questions, and share opinions. Join a global community committed to promoting limitless learning
Can a home health care pharmacy provide emergency kits? a) Yes, always b) No, never
Can a home health care pharmacy provide emergency kits? a) Yes, always b) No, never
Published:
Thu Feb  1 08:10:46 PM 2024 Greenwich Mean Time
Which is greater 8.2 x 10-5 2.7 x 10-2
Which is greater 8.2 x 10-5 2.7 x 10-2
Published:
Sun Oct 25 09:04:47 PM 2020 Greenwich Mean Time
A distortion of information about the demand for a product as it passes from one entity to the next across the supply chain is called the effect.
A distortion of information about the demand for a product as it passes from one entity to the next across the supply chain is called the effect.
Published:
Wed Feb 19 10:31:20 PM 2020 Greenwich Mean Time
Draw a rectangle model. Find the tens product, the ones product and the total product
Draw a rectangle model. Find the tens product, the ones product and the total product
Published:
Thu Jan  4 10:19:45 PM 2024 Greenwich Mean Time
The party store cups in packs of 8. Miss.Ruiz wanted 15 packs of cups. She bought 10 packs of blue cups and 5 packs of purple cups. How many purple cups did she
The party store cups in packs of 8. Miss.Ruiz wanted 15 packs of cups. She bought 10 packs of blue cups and 5 packs of purple cups. How many purple cups did she buy?How many blue cups did she buy?How many cups did she buy altogether?
Published:
Wed Oct 16 06:10:27 PM 2019 Irish Standard Time
which of the following was a difficulty faced by the Ottoman Empire in the 1700's and 1800's
which of the following was a difficulty faced by the Ottoman Empire in the 1700's and 1800's
Published:
Thu Jan  4 05:27:49 PM 2018 Greenwich Mean Time
Anyone know? Help is much appreciated! Will mark branliest
Anyone know? Help is much appreciated! Will mark branliest
Published:
Thu Oct 18 06:23:15 PM 2018 Irish Standard Time
Accounting about Stockholders' Equity? 1. Common stockholders usually have all of the following rights except: a) To receive dividends when declared. b) To shar
Accounting about Stockholders' Equity? 1. Common stockholders usually have all of the following rights except: a) To receive dividends when declared. b) To share in the distribution of assets. c) To elect board of directors. d) To participate in the day-to-day operations. 2. Which of the following is a reason that a corporation would prefer to issue stock instead of bonds? a) Dividend payments can be deducted for income tax purposes but interest payments cannot. b) Expansion is accomplished without surrendering ownership control. c) The risk of going bankrupt is less. d) All of the above are reasons for issuing stock. 3. Which of the following financing alternatives has the highest preference of payment in a case where the company liquidates its assets? a) Common Stock. b) Preferred Stock. c) Bonds. d) They have equal preference. Please help me. Thank you for your help.
Published:
Mon Apr 18 10:43:24 AM 2016 Irish Standard Time
An electric cooter company charge 1 to rent a cooter plu an additional 0. 15 per minute the cooter i rented. Which expreion repreent the cot, in dollar, for ren
An electric cooter company charge 1 to rent a cooter plu an additional 0. 15 per minute the cooter i rented. Which expreion repreent the cot, in dollar, for renting a cooter for m minute
Published:
Wed Nov 30 12:10:40 AM 2022 Greenwich Mean Time
3. The ratio of blue marbles to white marbles in Simran’s bag is equal to 1 to 2. If there are 20 blue marbles, how many white marbles are there? A 20 C 40 B 30
3. The ratio of blue marbles to white marbles in Simran’s bag is equal to 1 to 2. If there are 20 blue marbles, how many white marbles are there? A 20 C 40 B 30 D 50
Published:
Tue May 11 09:31:59 PM 2021 Irish Standard Time
What is the conjugation fo competir for usted? Options: compites,compite,competes,compete
What is the conjugation fo competir for usted? Options: compites,compite,competes,compete
Published:
Fri Dec 11 04:11:04 PM 2020 Greenwich Mean Time
1 Write a one or two statements to explain each of these views I .Earth is a system of systems, of which humans are a part. Ii Energy cycles through these syste
1 Write a one or two statements to explain each of these views I .Earth is a system of systems, of which humans are a part. Ii Energy cycles through these systems and affects changes in the composition of, but not the amount of the matter in the system. iii. Our actions cause changes in the composition and energy content of the environment, and this changed environment can affect our lives. iv Negative aspects of this change are distributed inequitably; the poorest are most negatively affected.
Published:
Sat Oct 29 09:36:06 PM 2022 Irish Standard Time
what is the 3,614×272
what is the 3,614×272
Published:
Sat Oct 29 03:21:06 AM 2022 Irish Standard Time
Which of the following are subject pronouns in Spanish? Yo, nosotros, unos, unas Yo, nosotros, él Yo, los, las los, las, unos, unas
Which of the following are subject pronouns in Spanish? Yo, nosotros, unos, unas Yo, nosotros, él Yo, los, las los, las, unos, unas
Published:
Mon Jan 11 10:05:14 PM 2021 Greenwich Mean Time
Chart and assignment above, any actual help is appreciated!! Eighth grade math :) 1. How many cars per day does Car Mart sell? How did you use the table to find
Chart and assignment above, any actual help is appreciated!! Eighth grade math :) 1. How many cars per day does Car Mart sell? How did you use the table to find this rate? 2. How many cars per day does Winston's sell? Explain how you found this rate. 3. Which dealership sells more cars per day? How many more? 4. Which dealership started with more cars? How many more cars did that dealership start with? Explain how you found your answer.
Published:
Tue Nov 10 01:45:28 AM 2020 Greenwich Mean Time
What does bread symbolize in Night By Elie Wiesel
What does bread symbolize in Night By Elie Wiesel
Published:
Thu Oct  1 02:00:14 AM 2020 Irish Standard Time
The purpose of project management is . executing a requirement improvement working toward a common goal completing a project
The purpose of project management is . executing a requirement improvement working toward a common goal completing a project
Published:
Tue Apr 27 10:40:19 PM 2021 Irish Standard Time
Mark is looking to secure a small business loan. The first lender is offering 11% compounded weekly, whereas the second lender is offering 11.25% compounded sem
Mark is looking to secure a small business loan. The first lender is offering 11% compounded weekly, whereas the second lender is offering 11.25% compounded semi-annually and the third lender is offering 11.6% compounded annually. Mark chose the loan that offers the lower effective rate.
Published:
Tue May 23 03:00:30 AM 2023 Irish Standard Time
Which remedy is NOT available to the Texas Real Estate Commission (TREC) upon finding that a Texas license holder has violated the Canons of Professional Ethics
Which remedy is NOT available to the Texas Real Estate Commission (TREC) upon finding that a Texas license holder has violated the Canons of Professional Ethics and Conduct
Published:
Thu Jun  1 12:21:17 PM 2023 Irish Standard Time
Following antigen-specific activation in T cells, what occurs with the genes encoding T-cell receptors? a) They undergo alternative mRNA splicing. b) They under
Following antigen-specific activation in T cells, what occurs with the genes encoding T-cell receptors? a) They undergo alternative mRNA splicing. b) They undergo somatic hypermutation. c) They undergo isotype switching. d) They undergo no further change.
Published:
Thu Mar  7 08:10:11 AM 2024 Greenwich Mean Time
A.)surrender Southern forces or face annihilation B.)attack the Northern city of Washington, D.C. C.)fire on Fort Sumter or let it be replenished D.)stop acts o
A.)surrender Southern forces or face annihilation B.)attack the Northern city of Washington, D.C. C.)fire on Fort Sumter or let it be replenished D.)stop acts of secession or be impeachedWhat decision did Davis make to make just prior to the beginning of the Civil War?
Published:
Wed Oct  5 02:22:47 PM 2016 Irish Standard Time
Which of the following offers the best evidence of the author's first person narrative voice in her book the house on mango street? a. the pronouns we, they and
Which of the following offers the best evidence of the author's first person narrative voice in her book the house on mango street? a. the pronouns we, they and she are used most often in the text. b. the author uses real characters in the plot. c. the pronouns i, me and my are used extensively in the text. d. the author uses setting as a character in her story.
Published:
Fri Mar 10 07:40:33 AM 2017 Greenwich Mean Time
The diseases that are caused by water pollution in the major cities of developing countries are mainly due to the
The diseases that are caused by water pollution in the major cities of developing countries are mainly due to the
Published:
Wed Apr 20 01:20:34 AM 2022 Irish Standard Time
There are 810 Calories in 3 scoops of vanilla ice cream. How many Calories are there in 7 scoops of ice cream?​
There are 810 Calories in 3 scoops of vanilla ice cream. How many Calories are there in 7 scoops of ice cream?​
Published:
Fri Sep 18 04:34:58 PM 2020 Irish Standard Time
Bassima evaluated the expression below. What was Bassima's error?
Bassima evaluated the expression below. What was Bassima's error?
Published:
Tue Nov 19 06:29:47 PM 2019 Greenwich Mean Time
Sub-policy 9
http://kenshoo.com/privacy-policy/:
Privacy Policy
Updated: 28th December 2023
We, at Kenshoo Ltd. d/b/a
Kenshoo Skai
and its affiliates (“
Company
”), put great efforts in making sure that we secure your personally identifiable information and use it properly.
This policy explains our privacy practices for processing the information it collects or receives from the individuals who interact with us, such as users of our website at skai.io and other
Kenshoo Skai
-owned websites (“users” and the “Websites”, respectively), customers, business partners, event attendees and recipients of marketing messages from
Kenshoo Skai
(“you”).
To dispel any doubt, it is clarified that this policy does not apply to the personally identifiable information collected and processed by the company’s Customers through or in the context of the services they receive from the Company. This information is controlled by the Customers, and its processing is subject to the privacy policy of each relevant Customer.
The summary of this policy will give you a quick and clear view of our practices. Please take the time to read our full policy.
A Summary of the Policy
The Personally Identifiable Information That You Provide Us
– We receive and store any information you enter on our website or give us in any other way.
Read more.
The Personally Identifiable Information That We Collect
– We automatically log ‘traffic/session’ information including IP addresses and user agent. We collect session durations and additional activity information.
Read more
What Do We Do with Personally Identifiable Information?
– We communicate with you and respond to any requests for information.
Read more.
Sharing Personally Identifiable Information with Others
– We use service providers to facilitate our Website and related marketing activities. We will transfer information when we change our corporate structure, and we will share the information with our affiliate entities.
Read more.
Information Security
– We implement systems, applications and procedures to secure your personally identifiable information, to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of information, or unauthorized access or use of information.
Read more.
Data Retention
– We retain data to provide the service and for legitimate and lawful purposes, as further explained in the data retention section of the policy.
Read more.
Your Choice
– You may opt-out of our mailing lists. Our Website does not respond to Do Not Track (DNT) signals.
Read more.
Accessing Your Personally
Identifiable Information
– At any time you can request access to your personally identifiable information.
Read more.
Specific Provisions for California Residents
– If you are a California resident, you are entitled to specific privacy rights.
Read more.
Your EU Data Subject Rights
– If we process your personal data when you are in the EU, further terms apply to our processing in relation to your rights as a data subject under EU data protection laws.
Read more.
Transfer of Data Outside your Territory
– We use cloud based services to store and process data in the European Union and in the United States and will store them at additional sites, at our discretion. These service providers provide us adequate security and confidentiality commitments.
Read more.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
– We will update our policy from time to time.
Contact Us
– Please contact us at:
privacy@skai.io
for further information.
Table of Contents
Definitions
The Personally Identifiable Information That You Provide Us
The Personally Identifiable Information That We Process
What Do We Do with Personally Identifiable Information?
Sharing Personally Identifiable Information with Others
Analytics and Marketing Automation
Information Security
Data Retention
Your Choice
Accessing Your Personally Identifiable Information
Specific Provisions for California Residents
Your EU Data Subject Rights
Transfer of Data Outside Your Territory
Links To Websites of Third Parties
Dispute Resolution
Changes to this Privacy Policy
“
C
ustomer”:
An entity that has entered into an agreement with Kenshoo
Kenshoo Skai
and is receiving the Kenshoo
Kenshoo Skai
Services.
“
C
ustomer Website”:
A website or other application, operated by a Customer.
“
Kenshoo Skai
” (or “
us
”, “
we
” or “
our
”):
Kenshoo Skai Ltd. 6 Ha’barzel St., Tel-Aviv, Israel 6971010 or any of its subsidiaries.
“
Privacy Policy
” or “
Policy
”:
Kenshoo Skai’s privacy policy as described herein.
The Personally Identifiable Information That You Provide Us
We receive and store any information you enter when using our Websites or give us in any other way.
When you sign up for and/or attend a
Kenshoo Skai
event or webinar.
You provide most of your information through forms you fill out on our Website to contact us.
When you contact us, or when we contact you, we will receive and process any personally identifiable information that you provide us.
In addition, when you use the Website, we monitor your use thereof and maintain this usage information as well.
If you are a candidate applying for a position, please see our Recruitment Privacy Policy.
Note that you are not required by law to provide us with any information about you. However, not providing certain personally identifiable information may, in some circumstances, prevent us from providing our Customers the
Kenshoo Skai
Services as intended.
Back to Table of Contents
The Personally Identifiable Information That We Process
We (or others on our behalf) may collect the following types of personally identifiable information about You:
Website activity information – whenever you use the Website, we monitor your use and record your activity therein. The information that we gather about you in this context includes any activity that you perform in the Website, such as dates and times on which you use them, your interaction with them, etc.;
Communication information – when you contact us, though any channel whatsoever, you may provide us with your full name, e-mail address, job description, telephone number and the content of your communication with us.
Aggregate Information – we will also create statistical, aggregated and anonymized data relating to You including business development and service improvements. Aggregated data is derived from personally identifiable information but in its aggregated form it does not relate to or identify any particular Customer or individual. This data is used to understand our customer base and to develop, improve and market the
Kenshoo Skai
Website.
Back to Table of Contents
What Do We Do with Personally Identifiable Information?
We use the personally identifiable information we collect and receive to the following purposes:
to communicate with you and respond to any requests for information;
to fulfil our contractual obligations,
to ensure the security of the Websites,
to analyse trends,
to administer the Websites,
to improve our products and services,
to better understand our customers and users and the way use and interact with our Websites, including their user experience,
to send you news and updates about our products and services,
to gather demographic information about our user base as a whole, and
to communicate with you in connection with our events and webinars. After an event/ webinar we may contact you about such event/ webinar and related
Kenshoo Skai
products and services.
To conduct surveys and send questionnaires; We process personally identifiable information related to prospective customers who engaged us through our website. This information will only be used for the purpose of evaluating, contacting and serving the prospective customers.
We will use the contact details you provide us (including e-mail address and phone number) in order to contact you for operational and service-related matters. Moreover, subject to the requirements of the applicable laws, we may use your contact details -for the purpose of providing you commercial materials related to our current and/or future products and services. You can unsubscribe from our marketing mailing lists by sending an opt-out request to
privacy@skai.io
.
We obey the law and expect you to do the same. If necessary, we will use personally identifiable information related to you to enforce our terms, policies and legal agreements, to comply with applicable laws, court orders and warrants, and assist law enforcement agencies, to collect debts, prevent fraud, misappropriation, infringements, identity thefts and any other misuse of the Service, and to take any action in any legal dispute and proceeding.
We commit to process personally identifiable information solely for the purposes described in this policy.
Back to Table of Contents
Sharing Personally Identifiable Information with Others
We do not sell, rent or lease your personally identifiable information. We will share personally identifiable information related to you to support our services and operations with third parties. These third parties include service providers such as hosting services, customer support, security providers, etc.. Such third parties are committed to protect your privacy as required under the applicable law.
We will also share your personally identifiable information with our affiliates. These mean companies within the Company group and include subsidiaries, sister-companies and parent companies, with the express provision that their use of your personally identifiable information will comply with this policy.
We will disclose or use Your data to defend or enforce our legal rights and in accordance with any applicable law. We will disclose personally identifiable information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
We may also share your personal information with our partners, for example, if we collected your information in joint marketing activities (events/webinars) with a partner, we may provide your Personal Information with that partner.
Additionally, a merger, acquisition or any other structural change will require us to transfer your personally identifiable information to another entity, as part of the structural change or of the negotiations therefor, provided that the receiving entity will comply with this policy.
We will share your personally identifiable information only subject to the terms of this policy, or subject to your prior consent.
Back to Table of Contents
Analytics and Marketing Automation
We use third parties’ analytics tools to better understand who is using the Services, how people are using the Services and how to improve the effectiveness of the Services and its content. We also use third party marketing automation tools to help us with our marketing efforts.
We use the standard analytics tools of Google Analytics we will use additional or other analytics tools, from time to time, to learn about how you and other users use the Service, in support of our Service-related activities and operations.
The privacy practices of these tools are subject to their own privacy policies. See Google Analytics Privacy Policy at:
https://www.google.com/analytics/learn/privacy.html
.
These service providers use cookies, pixel tags or other technologies to collect and store information. You can prevent analytics and marketing automation services from recognizing you by disabling third party cookies on your web browser, as further detailed in our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
.
In addition, we use anonymous, statistical or aggregated information and will share it with our partners for legitimate business purposes. It has no effect on your privacy, because there is no reasonable way to extract data from the aggregated information that we or others can associate specifically to you.
Back to Table of Contents
Information Security
We and our hosting services implement systems, applications and procedures to secure data we collect and process, to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of information, or unauthorized access or use of information.
These measures provide sound industry standard security. However, although we make efforts to protect your privacy, we cannot guarantee that the Website will be immune from any wrongdoings, malfunctions, unlawful interceptions or access, or other kinds of abuse and misuse.
Back to Table of Contents
Data Retention
We retain the different types of personally identifiable information that we maintain only for as long as necessary for the fulfilment of the purposes for processing the information, or for longer periods, if we find in necessary to comply with legal requirements applicable to us under the applicable law.
We will keep aggregated non-identifiable information without limitation, and to the extent reasonable we will delete or de-identify potentially identifiable information, when we no longer need to process the information.
Back to Table of Contents
Your Choice
At any time, you can unsubscribe from our marketing mailing lists by sending an opt-out request to
privacy@skai.io
. Please note that if you opt out of receiving marketing communications from us, we may still communicate with you from time to time if we need to provide you with non-marketing information about the Services or for other legitimate non-marketing reasons.
At any time, you can stop using our website.
At any time, you can exercise your following opt-out options:
Cookie opt-out – You may elect to opt-out of enabling third party other types of cookies in your browser’s settings tools. For further information about cookies, please see our Cookie Policy.
You can also exercise your choice by contacting us at:
privacy@skai.io
.
Web browsers offer a “Do Not Track” (“DNT”) signal. A DNT signal is a HTTP header field indicating your preference for tracking your activities on a service or through cross-site user tracking. Our Website does not respond to DNT signals.
Back to Table of Contents
Accessing Your Personally Identifiable Information
At any time, you can contact us at:
privacy@skai.io
and request to access the personally identifiable information that we keep about you. We will ask you to provide us certain credentials and/or information to make sure that you are who you claim to be and to the extent required under the applicable law, will make good-faith efforts to locate your personally identifiable information that you request to access.
If you are eligible for the right of access under the applicable law, you can obtain confirmation from us of whether we are processing personally identifiable information about you, and receive a copy of that data, so that you could –
verify its accuracy and the lawfulness of its processing;
request the correction, amendment or deletion of your personally identifiable information if it is inaccurate or if you believe that the processing of your personally identifiable information is in violation of the applicable law.
We will use judgement and due care to redact from the data which we will make available to you, personally identifiable information related to others or that reveals proprietary information of the Company.
Back to Table of Contents
Specific Provisions for California Residents
This section applies solely to users of our Website who reside in the State of California.
The personal information that we collect
In the preceding twelve (12) months we have collected the following categories of personal information:
Identifiers and Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)), such as names, telephone numbers, business postal addresses, Internet Protocol address, email address and the time and value of a Transaction.
Website usage information.
Information gathered as part of communication between us.
Commercial information related to transactions with Customers.
Internet or other similar network activity.
Inferences drawn from other personal information.
Our business purposes for collecting your personal information
We collect your personal information for various business purposes, all as described above under the section titled What Do We Do With Personally Identifiable Information.
The categories of sources from which your personal information is collected
We obtain the categories of personal information listed above from various sources, including directly from Users and our website’s visitors, from your Website activities and from third party service providers, as further described above under the section titled The Personally Identifiable Information That We Collect.
The categories of third parties with whom we share your personal information
We may share your personal information with various third parties such as our service providers and our affiliates, as further described above under the section titled Sharing Personally Identifiable Information with Others.
The categories of personal information disclosed to said third parties:
In the preceding twelve (12) months we have disclosed the following categories of personal information for business purposes:
Identifiers and Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)), such as names, telephone numbers, business postal addresses, Internet Protocol address, email address and the time and value of a Transaction.
Website usage information.
Information gathered as part of communication between us.
Commercial information related to transactions with Customers.
Internet or other similar network activity.
Inferences drawn from other personal information.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have not sold personal information. However, since the CCPA and CPRA define the term “sale” very broadly to include any exchange of data for consideration of any kind, depending upon the circumstances, our sharing of personally identifiable information with other entities to assist us with targeted advertising might amount to the “selling” of personal information.
Your Rights as a California Resident
You are entitled to the following specific rights under the CCPA and the CPRA in relation to your personal information:
Access to Specific Information and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that we will disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your personal information over the past 12 months. After verifying your request, we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting that personal information;
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information;
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you;
If we disclosed your personal information for a business purpose, we will provide you with a list which will identify the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Correction Right
Taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing thereof, you have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you.
Deletion Rights
You have the right to request that we delete your personal information. Upon confirmation of your request, we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception under applicable law applies.
Right to non-selling
We may share personal information about you with third parties in ways that may constitute a “sale” under the CCPA and CPRA. You may request that we not “sell” your personal information on a going-forward basis. To do so, please contact us at:
privacy@skai.io
, and include your name, email address and/or Company name.
We shall not discriminate against you because you exercised any of your rights under the CCPA or CPRA.
Exercising Your Rights
To exercise the rights described above, please submit your request to us by sending an email to:
privacy@skai.io
.
Only you or a person authorized to act on your behalf, may make a request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child.
A request for access can be made by you only twice within a 12-months period.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with the requested personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information relates to you. We will only use the personal information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
We will do our best to respond to your request within 45 days of its receipt. If we require more time (up to additional 45 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. If you do not have an account with us, we will deliver our written response by mail or electronically, at your option.
Any disclosures that we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding receipt of your request.
The response we provide will also explain the reasons for our inability to comply with your request, if applicable.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will inform you of the reasons for such decision and provide you with a cost estimate before processing further your request.
Back to Table of Contents
Your EU Data Subject Rights
If EU data protection laws apply to the processing of personal data related to you by Company, then the following terms apply:
Under EU data protection laws, Company, will be considered a data controller as such term is defined therein, with respect to the processing of personal data about You.
Our EU Representative can be found at:
Rickert Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH
– Kenshoo d/b/a
Kenshoo Skai
–
Colmantstraße 15
53115 Bonn
Germany
art-27-rep-skai@rickert.law
.
With respect to the processing activities that we perform as a data controller and which are covered by this policy, the processing is based on the following lawful grounds:
All processing of your personal data which are not based on the lawful grounds indicated below, are based on your consent.
We process your account and usage details to perform the contract with you (or, with the entity on behalf of which you operate as a representative).
We will process your personal data to comply with a legal obligation.
We will further rely on our legitimate interests, which we believe are not overridden by your fundamental rights and freedoms.
Where the legal basis for the processing of the personal data about you is for its being necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us, you may, at any time, approach us by sending a notice to the email address
privacy@skai.io
, in order to receive information concerning the review performed by us. This is so you can conclude that we may process the personal data about you on account of such processing being necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us.
In addition to your rights under other sections in this policy, and subject to the limitations and restrictions of the EU data protection laws you have the following rights:
AT ANY TIME, CONTACT US IF YOU WANT TO WITHDRAW YOUR CONSENT TO THE PROCESSING OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA. EXERCISING THIS RIGHT WILL NOT AFFECT THE LAWFULNESS OF PROCESSING BASED ON CONSENT BEFORE ITS WITHDRAWAL.
Request to restrict access to your personal data, if this right is applicable under the circumstances. We will review your request and use our judgment, pursuant to the provisions of the applicable law, to reach a decision about your request.
If you exercise one (or more) of the above-mentioned rights, in accordance with the provisions of applicable law, you may request to be informed that third parties that hold your personal data, in accordance with this policy, will act accordingly.
You may ask to transfer your personal data in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format, in accordance with your right to data portability.
You may object, on grounds relating to your particular situation, to the processing of personal data about you that is based on the legitimate interests pursued by us, including profiling based on such legitimate interests.
You may object to the processing of your personal data for direct marketing purposes. Additional information about this right is available under the Choice section in this policy.
You have the right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affecting you.
You have a right to lodge a complaint with a data protection supervisory authority of your habitual residence, place of work or of an alleged infringement of the GDPR.
A summary and further details about your rights under EU data protection laws, is available on the EU Commission’s website at:
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/reform/rights-citizens_en
.
Note that when you send us a request to exercise your rights, we will need to reasonably authenticate your identity and location. We will ask you to provide us credentials or information to make sure that you are who you claim to be and will further ask you questions to understand the nature and scope of your request.
If we need to delete your personal data following your request, it will take some time until we completely delete residual copies of your personal data from our active servers and from our backup systems.
If you have any concerns about the way we process your personal data, you are welcome to contact our privacy team at:
privacy@skai.io
, or write to us to:
Kenshoo Skai
Ltd., 30 Ha’barzel St., Tel-Aviv, Israel 6971010. We will look into your inquiry and make good-faith efforts to respond promptly.
Back to Table of Contents
Transfer of Data Outside Your Territory
We store and process information in various sites throughout the globe, including on sites operated and maintained by cloud-based service providers.
We make sure that our service providers who process personal information on our behalf provide us with adequate confidentiality and security commitments.
If you are a resident in a jurisdiction where transfer of your personally identifiable information to another jurisdiction requires your consent, then you provide us your express and unambiguous consent to such transfer. You can contact our privacy team at:
privacy@skai.io
for further information about data transfer.
If the transfer of personally identifiable information related to you is governed by GDPR, we transfer such personally identifiable information to our various service providers, which have their place of business outside the European Economic Area (EEA), including in the U.S. Therefore, on each time where personal data which is subject to the GDPR may be transferred outside the EEA, we will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your personal information is subject to appropriate safeguards as are required by virtue of the EU privacy laws, including entering into contracts that require the recipients of personal information to adhere to data protection standards that are considered satisfactory under EU privacy laws and other applicable legislation. For more information about these safeguards, please contact our privacy team at:
privacy@skai.io
.
Back to Table of Contents
Links To Websites of Third Parties
The Website may provide links to websites and/or applications of third parties. We do not control such websites and applications, nor the collection and/or processing of personal information about you by such websites and applications, and we are not responsible for such websites and applications, nor for their privacy and data protection policies and activities. This policy does not apply to any actions taken via such websites and/or applications.
Whenever you access such third parties’ websites and/or applications, we recommend that you carefully review their privacy policies prior to using such websites and/or applications and prior to disclosing any personal data about you.
Back to Table of Contents
Dispute Resolution
We do periodical assessments of our data processing and privacy practices, to make sure that we comply with this policy, to update the policy when we believe that we need to, and to verify that we display the policy properly and in an accessible manner. If you have any concerns about the way we process personally identifiable information related to you, you are welcome to contact our privacy team at:
privacy@skai.io
, or write to us. Our address is published on our website at:
skai.io
and, if applicable, is indicated in your subscription agreement with us.
We will look into your query and make good-faith efforts to resolve any existing or potential dispute with you.
We commit to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of personally identifiable information related to you. European Union individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding this privacy policy should first contact our privacy team at:
privacy@skai.io
.
Back to Table of Contents
Changes to this Privacy Policy
From time to time, we will update this policy. If the updates have minor if any consequences, they will take effect immediately after we published the revised policy in the website. In case that we will make substantial changes to this policy, we will strive to inform you about such changes via means of communication we believe are reasonably appropriate to inform you of such amendments and by publishing a notice about such amendments on the Website.
Back to Table of Contents
Contact Us:
For further information, please contact our Privacy Compliance at:
privacy@skai.io
and our EU Representative at:
Rickert Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH
– Kenshoo d/b/a
Kenshoo Skai
–
Colmantstraße 15
53115 Bonn
Germany
art-27-rep-skai@rickert.law
.
Sub-policy 10
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 11
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Website Privacy Policy
Last updated May 28, 2024
This Privacy Policy applies to: (i) use of the AppsFlyer owned and operated Websites (appsflyer.com, onelink.me and their subdomains); (ii) our marketing activities including, registrations as part of webinars, conference events, emails etc.; and (iii) any other product or activity that links to, or otherwise references, this privacy policy (collectively, the “Marketing Platforms“). We respect your privacy rights and value your trust. This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, receive, use, store, share, transfer, and process your personal information, as well as your rights in determining what we do with the information that we collect or hold about you.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use by customers of the AppsFlyer service, which is described under our
Services Privacy Policy
.
Information We Collect
When using or interacting with our Marketing Platforms, we may collect or receive the following types of information (collectively, “Information”).
“Personal Information” such as name, email, contact details or any other personal content that you provide to us whether through a form or field on our website or any other communication (e.g. email, phone, post etc.).
“Technical Information” such as browser type, operating system, device type, IP address and other similar technical information typically received from a browser or device automatically when visiting or interacting with our Marketing Platforms. This may include the referring URL that led you to our website.
“Usage Information” such as the pages you visited on our website, where you clicked, searches performed on our website and other similar information related to how you have used our website. It may also include information related to whether you receive, opened or clicked on any links in an email sent to you.
We understand that certain Technical information or Usage Information may, either alone or when combined with other data, be deemed personal data under various laws and jurisdictions and we are committed to treating such data in compliance with applicable laws.
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
Depending on the type of Information, we may collect or receive Information in the following ways:
When you voluntarily share Information with us. For example, when you register to one of our events, request that we contact you through our online forms, submit your CV, or when you request to receive certain content that we may make available (e.g. research and white papers).
Through use of cookies and other similar technologies (e.g. HTML5 Local Storage, LSO, web beacons, JavaScript, etc.). These technologies help us to analyze how our Marketing Platforms are used and to tailor content that is relevant to you. It also helps us to deliver more relevant advertisements to you on our own or third party sites. For more information on such technologies, including how to manage your cookie preferences please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information obtained from third party sources. This includes Information received through the various business support tools and services that we use (e.g. marketing platforms, analytics services etc.) and public sources such as social media sites. We may combine the Information received through these sources with other Information we have in order to ensure our records are up to date and so that we are able to provide you with relevant content.
You have choices in how we collect and use Information. See the “
Your Choices
” section below for more information.
The Purposes
We use Information for the following purposes:
To process your inquiries and to respond to your requests. For example, when you contact us to learn more about our products or services or when you request to receive certain materials from us (e.g. white papers, research papers, product and services information). Additionally, if you submit your CV to us, we use it to evaluate your candidacy (including by assessing your qualifications and skills).
To send you information related to our services and products that we believe may interest you, such as newsletters or product and service updates. Such communications will be sent to you when you have chosen to receive such communication or when we have a legitimate interest to market our products and services. In any event, you will always be able to opt-out of receiving such communications. Opting out may be done either directly in the communication received or through the ways described in the instructions in the “
Your Choices
” section below.
To understand how you have used our Marketing Platforms and to customize them in accordance with your interests and past actions and choices. We do this based on our legitimate interest to operate our Marketing Platforms, diagnose any problems with the Marketing Platforms and to improve the Marketing Platforms and your experience when navigating through them.
In our legitimate interest to prevent fraud or harm to us or to any third party, and ensure the security of our network and services.
Where it is necessary for AppsFlyer to comply with its legal obligations and to exercise and enforce its legal rights.
We may use certain third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Who We Share Information With
In order to conduct our business and operate our Marketing Platforms, we may share Information with various third parties, such as:
Our subsidiary companies and global branches.
Third parties that help us operate our Marketing Platforms (e.g. hosting company, recruitment platforms and agencies, payment processors, business management and email distribution service providers and other similar service providers). These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When required by law, such as to comply with court orders, search warrants, regulatory orders, subpoenas, and other lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
Legal authorities, consultants, advisors or service providers when required to investigate, respond to, or prevent, fraud; or when required to ensure the security of our network and services and protect the safety of AppsFlyer or the public.
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, Information may be transferred to the merging or acquiring company, as well as to any advisors representing a party during discussions of such merger or acquisition.
AppsFlyer resellers, agents, partners or service providers acting on our behalf in connection with the offering of AppsFlyer’s products or services.
Third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Without derogating from the foregoing, AppsFlyer may publish general aggregate and unidentifiable information (e.g. statistical information) relating to use of its Marketing Platforms.
Cross Border Data Transfers and Mechanisms
We may need to transfer Information to countries where we and/or our service providers operate. Such countries may be different from the country in which the data originated and where data protection laws may not be equivalent to, or offer the same protection as, those in your country. By using our Marketing Platforms, you agree to any such transfers. In any event, where appropriate given the nature of services, we will put in place agreements with our service providers to ensure a level of privacy consistent with the terms of this policy.
With regards to the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
AppsFlyer Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. AppsFlyer Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as well as to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view AppsFlyer’s certification, please visit
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over AppsFlyer Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, and in case of onward transfer of data to third parties, AppsFlyer maintains liability.
In compliance with the DPF Principles, AppsFlyer is committed to resolving any complaints arising regarding our processing of your personal data. You may direct your queries to privacy@appsflyer.com and, in compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we are committed to referring unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPF to Truste, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://trustarc.com/dispute-resolution/
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of Truste are provided at no cost to you and allow for binding arbitration.
Protecting Your Information
We strive to meet the highest standards of security measures across our business units. We have implemented appropriate technical and organizational measures based on industry-leading standards. Such measures are designed to protect against unauthorized access or unlawful processing of Personal Information and against accidental loss, destruction or damage of Personal Information. As part of such measures, we have established various policies and procedures that guide us, including in respect of asset management, access management, physical security, people security, product security, cloud and network infrastructure security, third-party security, vulnerability management, security monitoring, and incident response.
Information Storage and Retention
We may store Information on our own servers as well as those operated by third party data hosting providers. As specified in Section 5 above (Cross Border Transfers), such servers may be located worldwide. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary to pursue the purpose of the collection. We may also retain your Personal Information for such time needed to pursue our legitimate business interests, in connection with any legal claims and compliance with legal obligations. When we use your information for direct marketing purposes, we will retain your data until you opt-out from receiving the marketing materials; provided that we will need to retain certain information to maintain a record of your request.
Modifications to This Policy
AppsFlyer may amend this Privacy Policy at any time, provided that in the event of a material change we shall provide notice on this page and/or a note near the link to this page. The updates shall apply immediately for new Information collected or provided as of the day of the update and following thirty (30) days for any Information collected or provided to AppsFlyer prior to the update date. If you do not agree to the terms of the new policy you are requested to contact the Legal Department using the contact details listed in Section 11 below. We encourage you to periodically review this page for any updates.
Your Choices
We provide you with various choices on how we may use Information in connection with: (i) our marketing activities; and (ii) our use of cookies and similar technologies to serve your interest-based advertisements and to analyze usage of our Marketing Platforms.
You may choose to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails, accessing the email preferences in your account settings page, or you can contact us at
https://www.appsflyer.com/company/contact/
. You can manage your preferences related to our use of cookies and similar technologies that we use, among other things, to provide you with targeted interest-based advertisements and to analyze your use of our Marketing Platforms – please see our
Cookie Policy
for instructions. Additionally, certain advertisers (including Google) we work with may be members of NAI and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance. You may opt-out from such advertisers’ services here or at the following link:
https://youradchoices.com/
In addition, the laws of some jurisdictions may provide you with various rights in connection with our processing of certain Information. Such rights may include:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. For any additional information regarding such rights or to exercise any such rights please contact AppsFlyer at: privacy@appsflyer.com
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Social Media and Third Party Services
Our website may offer a blog with ‘comments’ section and various social media features, such as a ‘share’ button or links to third party websites and services, including Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+ and Facebook. When using any such features, certain information may be collected by such third parties, including your IP address or which page you are visiting on our website, and such third parties may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Any data collected by such third parties is governed by such third party’s privacy policy. You are encouraged to carefully review such third party privacy policies.
Children’s Privacy
AppsFlyer does not knowingly collect or process personal data from or with respect to children under the age of 16, and you must be 16 years of age or older in order to establish an account for AppsFlyer’s Services. If you are a parent or legal guardian and believe that your child under the age of 16 has submitted his or her personal data or other data without your consent, permission, or authorization – please let us know immediately, and we will promptly act to remove your child’s data from our database, cease the use of such data and inform any other party we suspect to have access to such data to do the same.
California Privacy Rights
We may collect personal information about California residents who are afforded additional rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 et seq. (the “CCPA“). If you are a California resident, you can see more details about the types of personal information we have collected from you in the past 12 months and may collect from you in Section 1 above (
Information We Collect
) and how we collect such personal information in Section 2 above (
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
). The purposes for which we collect your personal information are further described in Section 3 above (
The Purpose
). We do not share your personal information with any third party except as further described in Section 4 above (
Who We Share Information With
). Please refer to the other terms of this Privacy Policy to see further rights afforded to you and how we use your personal information.
We do not “Sell” (as defined in the CCPA) your personal information which we have collected or may collect and in the event we will Sell your personal information, we will notify you by updating this Privacy Policy in accordance with Section 8 above (
Modifications to this Policy
) and we will provide you with the option of opting out of such “sale”.
You, as a California resident, have certain rights regarding your personal information pursuant to the CCPA, subject to certain restrictions under applicable laws, including the rights to access your personal information, to delete your personal information, and to opt out of the “sale” of your personal data. You may request any of these by contacting us via email at
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. Upon your request, we will verify that you are the person making this request and in order to do so, we may request identification documents from you.
Contacting Us
If you have any questions or concerns about this Website Privacy Policy, the information we collect, the practices of AppsFlyer, or your dealings with the Marketing Platforms, please contact us or our Data Protection Officer by sending an email to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany Schönhauser Allee 180, 10119 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49 30 166373500).
Our Cookies Policy
AppsFlyer respects your privacy as our website user. We use cookies to improve your user experience and for remarketing. Some of this data may be shared with select partners. See our
cookies policy
for more information.
Reject all cookies
Accept all cookies
Customize
Cookie Preference Center
AppsFlyer uses Cookies to provide, maintain, and improve our websites, to optimize our offerings and marketing activities, and to provide our visitors and users with a better experience, for example, in order to maintain your preferences, to better secure our websites, to identify technical issues, and to monitor and improve the overall performance of our websites.
More information
Allow All
Please select which Cookies you approve, you may choose all options.
Always Active
Necessary Cookies are enabled for the assurance and function of a properly run website, and they cannot be disabled. They are usually only set in response to actions permitted by you, such as, enabling functions like navigation and access to secure areas of the website. These Cookies do not store personal information that will be used for other purposes.
Performance Cookies
These Cookies provide us with aggregated (anonymous) insights into website enhancement and performance improvement. These cookies allow us to measure and improve the performance of our Sites. They help us know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the website.
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Functional Cookies
These Cookies enable us to provide enhanced functionality and personalization through our Sites and allow for a better user experience. These may be set by us (first-party Cookies) or by third-party providers who work with us (third-party Cookies).
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 12
https://www.braze.com/privacy:
Legal
/
Privacy Policy...
Privacy Policy
For individuals interested in learning more about how we handle personal data related to job applications and recruitment, please
refer to our Candidate Privacy Policy for detailed information on our privacy practices
.
Last Updated:
February 27, 2025
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PART I. GENERAL INFORMATION
1.1 OUR COMMITMENT TO PRIVACY
1.2 INTRODUCTION TO BRAZE
1.3 SCOPE OF THIS POLICY
PART II. DATA COLLECTION AND USE
2.1 DATA COLLECTION
2.2 PURPOSES OF PROCESSING
2.3 DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
PART III. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS, SECURITY AND DATA RETENTION
3.1 PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA IN THE U.S. AND ELSEWHERE
3.2 SECURITY
3.3 DATA RETENTION
PART IV. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.1 EXERCISING YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.2 PRIVACY RIGHTS AND BRAZE CUSTOMERS
4.3 MARKETING AND ADVERTISING
4.4 COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
4.5 CHAT TECHNOLOGIES
PART V. LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA
PART VI. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
6.1 YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS.
6.2 CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA THAT WE COLLECT AND THIRD PARTIES TO WHOM THE DATA MAY BE DISCLOSED
6.3 THE SALE AND SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
6.4 SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION AND DE-IDENTIFIED DATA
PART VII. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR JAPANESE VISITORS
7.1 PERSONAL DATA DISCLOSURE
7.2 BRAZE JAPAN’S INFORMATION
PART VIII. OTHER IMPORTANT INFORMATION
8.1 CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
8.2 CHILDREN
8.3 HOW TO CONTACT US
PART I. GENERAL INFORMATION
1.1 OUR COMMITMENT TO PRIVACY
Your privacy is important to us and maintaining your trust is one of our highest priorities. This Privacy Policy provides you with a description of how we collect and use data relating to or identifying individuals (“
Personal Data
”). We also provide information on privacy rights, how to exercise these rights and how to contact us with any questions.
1.2 INTRODUCTION TO BRAZE
Braze is a U.S. company, headquartered in New York, with global operations. A reference to “
Braze
,” “
we
,” “
us
” or the “
Company
” is a reference to Braze, Inc. and the relevant affiliate(s) involved in the processing activity.
Braze is a life-cycle engagement platform for companies around the world, supporting stronger relationships between brands and their clients, primarily by leveraging first party data to personalize and automate life-cycle marketing campaigns through first party channels, such as email, SMS, mobile and web push notifications, and in-app/in-browser messaging.
More information about Braze can be found on our
main website
. For details specific to our services in Japan, please visit the
Braze Japan website
.
1.3 SCOPE OF THIS POLICY
What is in Scope?
This Privacy Policy applies to Braze, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Data for our marketing or business purposes (further details below) and in such capacity, we will use the term “Data Controller”.
What is not in Scope?
Our Websites and Services are intended to be used by businesses and their representatives. We do not offer any products or services to individuals for personal, family or household use. All Personal Data that we process is treated as belonging to individuals in a business capacity.
Braze’s privacy commitments to its customers, where we process Personal Data on behalf of our customers, are outlined in Braze’s agreements with such customers. In our capacity as a processor of our customers’ data, we will refer to ourselves as a “Data Processor.” Specifically, in that capacity, Braze processes Personal Data of people who interact with customer applications or websites that are offered by our customers and that have incorporated Braze technology (“
Customer Applications
”). The protections that apply to such Personal Data will be described in the individual privacy policies of those customers, and not in this Privacy Policy. If you wish to learn more about the privacy and data security practices of those customers, you should reach out to them directly. For clarity, this Privacy Policy does not cover any Personal Data that our customers choose to collect and share with Braze, where Braze is not the Data Controller, but is instead a Data Processor.
Individuals who are interested in, apply for, or are recruited for a job with Braze can find our related privacy practices described in our Candidate's Privacy Policy. For more details, please
view our Candidate Privacy Policy
.
Additionally, our Websites or Services (as defined below) may contain links to other websites, applications and services maintained by third parties. The privacy and data security practices of such third-party sites and/or services are governed by the privacy statements of those third parties, and not by this Privacy Policy.
PART II. DATA COLLECTION AND USE
2.1 DATA COLLECTION
The Personal Data that Braze collects will be determined by your interaction with Braze, our partners, Braze publications and other sources.
How and where do we collect data?
Braze collects Personal Data from prospects, customers, participants at our trainings, certifications and events, business partners and vendors (if they are natural persons), their respective employees, advisors, and/or consultants, along with the data of whomever our customers have authorized to use free and paid versions of the Braze services (the “
Services
”) on their behalf (collectively, “
Individuals
”), who:
Visit our websites (the “
Websites
”);
Visit our offices;
Receive/send communications from/to us, including via mail, email, phone call, Slack, chat features of our Websites, support tickets or texts;
Use our Services as an authorized user (for example, an employee of one of our customers who has been given a log-in to access our Services) (
"Dashboard User"
);
Register for, attend and/or otherwise take part in our events, webinars, contests, trainings and certification courses;
Download or otherwise engage with Braze content and publications, such as viewing our videos, reading content on our Websites, or interacting with our chat bot;
Submit requests for an action, support or information;
Participate in meetings or events;
Engage with our resellers or partners;
Work at partners or suppliers of Braze and interact with our company in the course of doing business or contemplating doing business with us; or
Otherwise directly interact with Braze.
Braze collects Personal Data from a variety of sources, such as from:
The Individual who is the subject of such Personal Data, including in their use of the Websites and the Services;
Publicly available sources, such as an individual’s social media account, online communities, forums, blogs or chat rooms;
Our business partners;
Vendors; and
Braze affiliates.
What type of data do we collect?
Personal Data that we may collect includes, but is not limited to:
Name and job title;
Contact information such as email address, business phone number, and business address;
Industry;
Employer;
Marketing subscription status;
Audio and video recordings and notes from meetings;
Event attendance and preferences associated with in-person event attendance, such as dietary requirements;
Trainings and certifications;
Downloads or engagement with Braze reports and other publications;
Communications that we exchange with you, including when you contact us with questions or feedback, through the support portal, email, calls to our support team, our chat features, social media, survey participation, or otherwise;
Certain information in connection with the use of the Websites by visitors and the Services by Dashboard Users, and information about your interaction with other relevant third-party pages displaying Braze content, which may include:
Device Data: information may include IP address (or proxy server), device and application identification numbers, location, browser type, Internet service provider and/or mobile carrier, and operating system and system configuration information; and
Usage Data: information, such as activity on the Websites and Services, the pages and files viewed, actions taken, conversations through our chat features, searches, account configuration information and date/time stamps associated with your usage.
Some of the information described above is collected through our Websites and our Services using logs, cookies and/or other tracking technologies. To read more about the cookies and tracking technologies we use, please visit our
Cookie Policy
. You are able to
manage your cookie consent preferences
.
We also use session replay technology provided by third-party vendors to record the interactions and Personal Data of Dashboard Users and visitors to certain Websites, such as our learning management system. We and such third-party vendors may use information from these recordings, which may include the Usage Data detailed above. Personal Data within these recordings may be processed for the purposes outlined in Section 2.2 of this Privacy Policy. Such recordings do not include Personal Data for which Braze is a Data Processor.
2.2 PURPOSES OF PROCESSING
Braze collects Personal Data for several purposes, including:
Enabling us to understand and engage with those who are interested in learning about our products, services, content, and company-related initiatives;
Promoting the security of our Websites and Services by tracking use of our Websites and Services, enforcing our terms and policies, investigating and preventing fraudulent, suspicious or illegal activities, and preventing unauthorized access to the Services;
Providing, operating, and maintaining the Services including billing and account management purposes;
Responding to requests for action, support or information;
Complying with our contractual obligation to provide technical and customer success support;
Registering office visitors to maintain the security of our offices and to ensure the confidentiality of our business activities;
Analyzing our customers' use of the Services and Websites for trend monitoring, marketing, advertising, business development, for improvements, for security purposes and to ensure continued proper functioning;
Marketing purposes;
To send marketing communications about us and our affiliates and partners, including information about our products, promotions or events via email and other channels;
To facilitate targeted advertising campaigns;
To send marketing communications about us and our affiliates and partners, including information about our products, promotions or events via email and other channels;
For internal training and research;
Sending messages to Dashboard Users about technical alerts, updates, security notifications, and educational, administrative or transactional communications; and
Complying and assisting with legal obligations, judicial proceedings, court orders and legal processes, pursuing remedies available to us and limiting our damages, responding to lawful requests and pursuing internal investigations.
Where we need to collect and process Personal Data by law, or under a contract we have entered into with you, and you fail to provide the required Personal Data when requested, we may not be able to comply with our legal obligations or perform our contract with you.
If you provide us with Personal Data relating to another person, you confirm that you have informed them of our identity, the purposes (as set out above) for which their Personal Data will be used, and that you have obtained their consent prior to sharing their Personal Data with us.
2.3 DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
We may disclose Personal Data to the following types of third parties and for the following purposes:
Braze Affiliates -
We may disclose Personal Data to Braze corporate group affiliates in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development, operations, account management, events or webinars, for general business purposes, in order to protect, exercise, establish or defend legal rights, where we are legally required to do so and to receive professional advice.
Partners -
If you use our Websites to register for an event or webinar organized by one of our partners, we may disclose your Personal Data to these partners to process your registration and manage your participation in the event. In such instances, our partner will process the relevant Personal Data as a separate controller and the partner’s use and control over your Personal Data will be governed by their privacy policy. We may also disclose your Personal Data to technology and solutions partners in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development and account management.
Vendors –
We may disclose Personal Data to third party vendors and service providers for general business purposes and to support our internal operations, including IT solutions vendors, marketing vendors, advertising vendors, consultants, professional advisers acting as processors or controllers, including lawyers, bankers, auditors and insurers. We may also disclose Personal Data where we believe it necessary in order to protect or exercise, establish or defend our legal rights.
Shared Communities -
Any Personal Data or other information you choose to submit in communities, forums, blogs or chat rooms on our Websites may be read, collected and used by others who visit these forums, depending on your account settings.
Law Enforcement -
We may disclose Personal Data to a third party where we are legally required to do so in order to comply with any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request, including government authorities, law enforcement and others.
Corporate Transaction Participants -
We may transfer Personal Data in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
PART III. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS, SECURITY AND DATA RETENTION
3.1 PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA IN THE U.S. AND ELSEWHERE
Braze, Inc. is located in the United States ("
U.S.
") and our group companies operate in Singapore, Germany, Japan, Canada, France, Australia, Indonesia, the United Kingdom ("
UK
"), Ireland, Romania, Brazil, South Korea and the United Arab Emirates. Braze works with vendors and partners who operate predominantly in these countries. From time to time, we may work with vendors and partners in other parts of the world where we do business. This means that when we collect your Personal Data, we may process it in any of these countries. These countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective), but we have in place appropriate safeguards and international transfer mechanisms (e.g., the Data Privacy Framework or the EU Standard Contractual Clauses). We also implement a number of supplementary measures designed to better protect the Personal Data with which we are entrusted.
Where available, Braze, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (collectively, the “Data Privacy Framework”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data transferred from the European Union, the UK, and Switzerland, as applicable, to the US in reliance on the Data Privacy Framework. For more details, please
read our Data Privacy Framework Notice
.
For non-US transfers, Braze may rely on an alternative transfer mechanism, including the 2021 EU Standard Contractual Clauses, to transfer Personal Data from the UK and European Economic Area ("
EEA
") to other third-party countries.
3.2 SECURITY
We use a number of technical, organizational and administrative security measures designed to protect the security, confidentiality and integrity of information. However, security risk is inherent in internet and information technologies and we cannot guarantee the security of your Personal Data.
3.3 DATA RETENTION
We will retain Personal Data we collect from you for so long as we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (in connection with the purposes set out in Part II above). We determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data on the basis of the purpose for which we process the Personal Data, the amount, nature and sensitivity of your Personal Data processed, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Data and whether we can achieve the purposes of the processing through other means, as well as on the basis of applicable legal requirements (such as applicable statutes of limitation). When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your Personal Data, we will either delete or anonymize it.
PART IV. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.1 EXERCISING YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
You may have the right under applicable law to request that we take certain actions in connection with Personal Data that we may have about you. Not all jurisdictions grant privacy rights, so whether or not you have any such rights, and the nature of those rights, if any, are determined by multiple factors, including your location, country, state, or place of residence. Privacy rights may include the following:
Information:
You may be able to request information about the categories of Personal Data we collect, the categories of sources from which we collect it, the purposes for which we process it, and the categories of third parties to whom we disclose it.
Access:
You may be able to request access to the Personal Data we hold about you.
Rectification/correction
: You may be able to request modification or correction of your Personal Data if it is inaccurate or incomplete.
Erasure/deletion:
You may be able to request that we delete Personal Data we hold about you.
Restriction:
You may be able to request that we restrict use of your Personal Data.
Objection:
You may be able to object to the processing of your Personal Data for direct marketing or where our legal basis for the processing is our legitimate interest.
Portability:
You may be able to request a copy of your Personal Data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format, to allow you to transfer your data to another provider.
Automated Decision Making:
You may be able to request not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, where it produces a legal or similar effect.
If you wish to exercise any of these requests, please
fill out the form provided
. We will respond to requests from individuals wishing to exercise data protection rights applicable to them. For certain rights, such as where you request access to Personal Data, we will need to confirm your identity. To verify your identity, we will require you to provide ID, where permitted or required by applicable law. You also have the right to exercise your applicable privacy rights free from discriminatory treatment and retaliation as prohibited by applicable law. These rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline or partially decline your request as permitted by law.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. For more information, please contact your local supervisory authority. If you have a question about your privacy rights, please email us at
privacy@braze.com
.
4.2 PRIVACY RIGHTS AND BRAZE CUSTOMERS
Braze customers may collect Personal Data through their websites or applications and send that data to the Braze Services. Where you wish to enforce any of your rights in respect of such data, we encourage you to contact the customer who provides you with the Customer Application, as this will be the quickest way to have your request processed. Where you submit a request about a Braze customer and you are able to identify the customer, we forward your request to the customer to handle.
4.3 MARKETING AND ADVERTISING
At any time, you have the right to opt-out of marketing communications that we send, or object to the use of your personal data for behavioral advertising. You can exercise these rights by
visiting the Braze Preference Center
for managing your communication preferences, or by using the contact details provided under the '
How to Contact Us
' heading below. Dashboard Users of the Services may exercise this right through preference center options available within the Services. Where applicable, you may also opt-out through unsubscribe options available within the marketing communication itself.
Please note that opting-out of the receipt of marketing communications or objecting to the use of your personal data for behavioral advertising does not opt you out of receiving important business communications related to your current relationship with us, such as communications about event registrations, service announcements or security information.
4.4 COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
You can manage your cookie preferences by
visiting our Cookie Consent Manager to customize your cookie settings
. Please see our
Cookie Policy
for further information on cookies and other tracking technologies.
4.5 CHAT TECHNOLOGIES
We use chat technologies provided by third-party vendors that employ cookies and software code to operate the chat features you can use to communicate with us through our Websites. We and such third-party vendors may monitor, record and use information from your interactions with our Websites. This information includes details you have shared through online chats, data on sections of the Website you have visited, your IP address and your general geographic information (e.g., city, state). This Personal Data may be processed for the purposes outlined in Section 2.2 of this Privacy Policy.
PART V. LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA
If you are from a region that requires us to have a legal basis for processing your Personal Data, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only where we have your consent to do so, where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
PART VI. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
If you are a California resident, this section applies to you in addition to the rest of the Privacy Policy. It provides more detail on how we collect, use and disclose Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this Part VI, Personal Information has the meaning given in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (“
CCPA
”). However, this Part VI does not apply:
To information exempted from the scope of the CCPA;
To Personal Information we collect, use, and disclose on behalf of our customers as a "service provider" under the CCPA for purposes of providing our Services to them.
6.1 YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
As a California resident, you have information, access, rectification/correction, erasure/deletion, and non-discrimination rights as described in Part IV (Your Privacy Rights). In addition, you have the right to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of Personal Information as those terms are defined by the CCPA.
If you have appointed an authorized agent to act on your behalf, your authorized agent may request to exercise these rights on your behalf upon our verification of the agent’s identity and our receipt of a copy of a valid power of attorney given to your authorized agent pursuant to applicable California law. If you have not provided your agent with such a power of attorney, we may ask you and/or your agent to take additional steps permitted by law to verify that your request is authorized, such as information required to verify your identity and that you have given the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
6.2 CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA THAT WE COLLECT AND THIRD PARTIES TO WHOM THE DATA MAY BE DISCLOSED
The following chart describes our practices currently in use and in use during the past 12 months. This chart summarizes the Personal Information we collect by reference to the statutory categories specified in the CCPA, and the categories of third parties to whom we may disclose it for a business purpose. These third parties are defined in Section 2.3 (Disclosure of Information to Third Parties). Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms or via email, may contain other categories of Personal Information not described below. The business/commercial purposes for which we use these categories of Personal Information listed in the below table are described above in Section 2.2 (Purposes of Processing). Our relevant data retention practices are addressed in Section 3.3 (Data Retention).
6.3 THE SALE AND SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
Like many companies, Braze uses services that employ cookies and other technologies to collect Personal Information (including the identifiers and internet activity information described in the table above) about your use of our Websites and other online services over time, which helps us to deliver behavioral advertising. In addition, we may provide your contact details to our advertising vendors for the placement of targeted ads. Braze may share contact details of business contacts with our technology or solutions partners during any sales negotiations. Our use of some of these services constitutes the “sale” or “sharing” of Personal Information as defined under the CCPA.
You may opt-out of such sales or sharing by clicking on the 'Do Not Sell or Share my Personal Information'
link
in the footer of our Websites and following the instructions therein. You can also opt-out of advertising cookies by
visiting our Cookie Consent Manager to adjust your cookie preferences
, or by enabling
Global Privacy Control
(“GPC”) in your web browser or browser extension, which we recognize to the extent required by applicable law. Enabling GPC will automatically set your cookie settings to opt out of the sharing of Personal Information for behavioral advertising. If you choose to use GPC, you will need to turn it on for each supported browser or browser extension you use. Other than GPC, we do not recognize any “do not track” signals.
Dashboard Users of the Services can also opt-out of the selling or sharing of contact details through setting preference center options available within the Services.
While our Website and Services are not directed to children under the age of 16, we are required to inform you that we have no actual knowledge that we have sold or shared the Personal Information of California residents under 16 years of age.
6.4 SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION AND DE-IDENTIFIED DATA
Braze does not use or disclose Sensitive Personal Information (as defined by the CCPA) for restricted purposes that California residents have a right to limit under the CCPA.
We do not to attempt to re-identify de-identified information that we derive from Personal Information, except for the purpose of testing whether our deidentification processes comply with applicable law.
PART VII. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR JAPANESE VISITORS
7.1 PERSONAL DATA DISCLOSURE
Braze K.K. (“
Braze Japan
”) may disclose your Personal Data to Braze group affiliates and other third parties for the purposes described in Section 2.3 (Disclosure of Information to Third Parties). A list of the Braze office locations may be found on our
Website
. The categories or items of the Personal Data that Braze Japan may disclose to a third party are the same as those described in Section 2.1 (Data Collection). When Braze Japan discloses your Personal Data to entrusted third parties, Braze Japan shall be the entity that is responsible for processing and managing your Personal Data.
7.2 BRAZE JAPAN’S INFORMATION
Braze Japan’s official name, address, and the name of the representative director can be found
on Braze Japan's company page
. If you have any questions, requests, or complaints about our processing of your Personal Data or this Privacy Policy, please follow the instructions described in Section 8.3 (How to Contact Us).
PART VIII. OTHER IMPORTANT INFORMATION
8.1 CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
If we change our Privacy Policy, we will update the “Last Updated” date at the top of this webpage. We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy frequently to stay informed of the latest modifications.
8.2 CHILDREN
Our Websites are not directed to individuals under the age of 16. We do not knowingly collect Personal Data from such individuals without parental consent and require our customers to fully comply with applicable law in the data collected from children under the age of 16. If you are a parent or guardian and believe your child has provided us with Personal Data without your consent, please contact us by using the information in the “
How to Contact Us
” section, below, and we will take steps to delete such Personal Data from our systems.
8.3 HOW TO CONTACT US
If you would like to update your preferences with regards to our marketing communications to you, you can do this in our
Preference Center
.
If you have a request regarding Braze’s processing of your Personal Data, please
fill out the request form provided here
.
If you would like to manage your cookie settings you may do so by
Visiting our Cookie Consent Manager.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, if you have a complaint, or would like to contact our DPO, you may contact us at:
privacy@braze.com
or
Braze, Inc.
Privacy Policy Issues
Attention: General Counsel
63 Madison Building
28 East 28th Street
12th Floor Mailroom
New York, NY 10016
USA